Project Gutenberg's President Heber C. Kimball's Journal, by Heber C. Kimball

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and most
other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms of
the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org.  If you are not located in the United States, you'll have
to check the laws of the country where you are located before using this ebook.

Title: President Heber C. Kimball's Journal
       Seventh Book of the Faith-Promoting Series

Author: Heber C. Kimball

Editor: George C. Lambert

Release Date: December 3, 2014 [EBook #47519]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK PRESIDENT HEBER KIMBALL'S JOURNAL ***




Produced by Paul Freebairn and the Mormon Texts Project
(MormonTextsProject.org).









PRESIDENT

HEBER C. KIMBALL'S

JOURNAL.

SEVENTH BOOK OF THE

FAITH-PROMOTING SERIES.

Designed for the Instruction and Encouragement of Young Latter-day
Saints.

JUVENILE INSTRUCTOR OFFICE.

Salt Lake City,

1882.



PREFACE

No apology is necessary for publishing as a volume of the
"FAITH-PROMOTING SERIES" some portion of the history of the late
President Heber C. Kimball. Knowing the estimation in which he was
held while living by the Latter day Saints universally, and that the
memory of his virtues and life-long devotion to the cause of God is
still fresh in their hearts, we feel assured that they will regard as
an acceptable offering the brief account of his experience contained
in this volume. We only regret that we cannot in the present work give
a sketch of his entire life, or at least all of those incidents from
it which would tend to promote faith in young readers. His was an
exceedingly active and interesting life, and it is scarcely necessary
to state that the sketch here published, covering a period of only
a little over four years, contains but a fraction of that which is
interesting and wonderful in his life's experience. However, what is
here given will doubtless convey many valuable lessons to those who
read it, and will serve to indicate the character of the great man of
whom it treats.

Heber Chase Kimball was one of the greatest men of this age. There was
a certain nobility about his appearance as well as his disposition that
would have made him conspicuous in any community, and the Church of
Jesus Christ afforded ample scope for the exercise of his ability, and
the trying scenes through which he passed called into play his best
powers.

He was a man of commanding presence, with eyes so keen as to almost
pierce one through, and before which the guilty involuntarily quailed.
He was fearless and powerful in rebuking the wrong-doer, but kind,
benevolent and fatherly to the deserving. He possessed such wonderful
control over the passions of men, combined with such wisdom and
diplomacy that the Prophet Joseph Smith called him "the peace-maker."
His great faith, zeal, earnestness, devotion to principle, cheerfulness
under the most trying circumstances, energy, perseverance and honest
simplicity marked him as no ordinary man. He possessed great natural
force and strong will power, yet in his submission to the Priesthood
and obedience to the laws of God he set a pattern to the whole Church.
His example throughout life was one of which his posterity may ever
think with pride, and which the Saints generally will do well to follow.

No man, perhaps, Joseph Smith excepted, who has belonged to the
Church in this generation, ever possessed the gift of prophecy to a
greater degree than Brother Kimball. Although not at all pretentious,
he was somewhat celebrated among his acquaintances for his prophetic
inspiration. The prediction which he made soon after the arrival of
the Pioneers in Salt Lake Valley, that the destitute Saints would soon
be supplied with clothing, and that "States goods" would be sold in
Salt Lake City as cheap as in New York, seemed most unreasonable at
the time it was uttered. Its fulfillment, however, by the unexpected
influx of gold-seekers, making their way to California, and anxious to
lighten their loads by selling their goods at almost any price, is now
a matter of history. Scores of other predictions were made by him and
as literally fulfilled.

Brother Kimball was the only one of his father's family who embraced
the gospel, but now his is one of the most numerous families in the
Church. At the time of his death, which occurred June 22, 1868, he was
the father of sixty-five children, of whom thirty males and eleven
females were then living. His direct descendants now number one hundred
and seventy-two.

The first ten chapters of this work were formerly published in pamphlet
form by Elder R. B. Thompson in Nauvoo. Only a small edition, however,
was printed, and it has now been out of print for a great many years.
The next six chapters have been compiled from the manuscript history of
Elder Kimball by his eldest daughter, Sister Helen Mar Whitney, to whom
we are also indebted for the items contained in his letters from which
the last chapter was written.

THE PUBLISHER.



CONTENTS

CHAPTER I.

Called to go Upon a Mission to England--Appointed to Preside--The
Journey.

CHAPTER II.

Timidity at the Thoughts of my Task--Prompted by the Spirit to go to
Preston--"The Truth Will Prevail"--Meet Elder Fielding's Brother, a
Preacher--Invited to Preach in his Chapel--Seeing his Craft Endangered,
he Closes his Doors Against us--Another Minister Forbids us Baptizing
his Church Members--Desperate Struggle with Evil Spirits--Commence
Baptizing--Elders Separate--Opposed by a Minister--His Subsequent Shame.

CHAPTER III.

Meeting for Confirmation--Convert and Baptize Miss Richards--Her
Father, a Minister, Invites me to Preach in his Chapel--Congregation
Believe my Testimony--Mr. Richards Frightened--Closes his Chapel
Against me--His Daughter Troubled--I Predict that he will Again Open
his Chapel to me--Prediction Fulfilled--Other Elders Encouraged by the
Rev. Mr. Matthews, who Afterwards Rejects their Testimony and Commences
Preaching their Doctrines on his Own Account.

CHAPTER IV.

The People Eager to Hear us--We Rent "The Cock Pit" to Preach
in--Obtain Licenses to Preach--Continued Success.

CHAPTER V.

First Conference in England--Word of Wisdom First Taught there--Enemies
Active--Urgent Invitation from a Baptist Church--The Effect of our
Preaching.

CHAPTER VI.

Impressed to Visit Downham and Chatburn--Bad Character of those
Places--Warned Against Going--Joy with which the Gospel was
Received--The People Eager to be Baptized--Loth to Part with me--Vain
Opposition from a Minister--Affecting Conduct of Little Children.

CHAPTER VII.

Visit to the Moon Family--Prejudiced Against our Doctrine--A Prophecy
about them--Impressed to Call at their House again--My Presence Hailed
With Joy as an Answer to Prayer--The Prophecy Fulfilled; they Join the
Church--A Dream and its Interpretation.

CHAPTER VIII.

Extraordinary Success--Very Cold Weather--Scenes of Suffering--Our
Excessive Labors--A General Conference--Farewell Meeting--Affection
Manifested for us--Elder Russell's Labors--Elder Goodson a Barrier.

CHAPTER IX.

Our Lodgings--Wants Supplied by Liberality of
Saints--Journey to Liverpool--Contrast Between Arrival and
Departure--Return Voyage--Meeting with Elders and Saints at New
York--Arrival at Kirtland.

CHAPTER X.

Removal to Missouri--Sickness--Kindness of the Saints at Far
West--Build a House, and then Have to Abandon it--Battle of Crooked
River--Death and Final Testimony of Apostle David W. Patten--Corner
Stone of Temple at Far West Laid--Removal to Illinois.

CHAPTER XI.

Far West Besieged--Joseph Smith and Brethren Betrayed by
Apostates--Atrocities of Mob--Conversation with W. E.
M'Lellin--Extermination Speech of General Clark.

CHAPTER XII.

Perils of the People--Cheerfulness of the Saints amidst their
Troubles--Visit our Brethren in Prison--Apostles Ordained--Mock
Distribution of State Appropriation--Letter from Joseph Smith
and Brethren in Prison--Indifference of State Officials to our
Appeals--Word of the Lord to me.

CHAPTER XIII.

Final Expulsion from Ear West--Destruction of Property--Escape of
Joseph Smith and Brethren--Attempt to Visit Parley P. Pratt and
Brethren in Prison--Forced to Flee to Escape Mob Violence--Assembly of
Apostles and Others on Temple Site According to Revelation--Arrival in
Illinois--Word of the Lord Fulfilled.

CHAPTER XIV.

Joyful Meeting with Joseph--First Conference in Illinois--First Visit
to Commerce--My Impression Concerning the New Gathering Place--My
Recommend--Struggle with Evil Spirits--Joseph Smith's Experience
with Evil Spirits--P. P. Pratt's Escape from Prison--Building
Houses--Prostrate with Sickness--Remarkable Manifestation of the Gift
of Healing.

CHAPTER XV.

Start upon a Mission under Distressing Circumstances--Incidents of the
Journey--A Drunken Doctor Gives me a Table-spoonful of Morphine--My
Life Saved Through the Prayer of Faith--Brethren Leave me to Proceed to
Kirtland--Their Fear that I would Die--I Predict that, I would Recover
and Reach Kirtland Before Them.

CHAPTER XVI.

Further Incidents of the Journey--Money Increased by the Power
of God--Arrival at Kirtland Ahead of Brethren, in Fulfillment of
my Prediction--Services in the Temple--Visit my Old Home and my
Relatives--Kind Treatment--Arrival in New York--Joyful Meeting with
Brethren.

CHAPTER XVII.

Incidents of Elder Kimball's Mission, as Gleaned from his Letters--Some
of his Prophecies Fulfilled--Elder Hyde's Account of the Contest
with Evil Spirits--Great Success of the work Throughout England--A
Testimonial--Summary of Labors--Return to Nauvoo.



PRESIDENT H. C. KIMBALL'S JOURNAL.



AN ACCOUNT OF HIS MISSION TO ENGLAND AND THE INTRODUCTION OF THE GOSPEL
TO THAT LAND.



CHAPTER I.

CALLED TO GO UPON A MISSION TO ENGLAND--APPOINTED TO PRESIDE--THE
JOURNEY.

The labors of the Elders of the Church of Latter-day Saints in early
days were confined to the United States of America, with the exception
of the province of Upper Canada, where a great many persons embraced
the gospel of Jesus Christ, and rejoiced in the blessings thereof. The
majority of this latter class were originally from Great Britain, and
they soon began to manifest a desire that their relatives and friends
who were still residing there, might be privileged with hearing the
glad tidings of salvation, and be made partakers of those gifts and
blessings which are promised in obedience thereto. For the attainment
of this object, their prayers were continually ascending to the Lord of
sabaoth, that He would prepare the way, and hasten the time when

  "The servants of the Lord
  Soon should take their stand,
  And spread the glorious light of truth--
  Throughout their native land."

Notwithstanding this desire, the way was not open for the Elders until
the spring of 1837, when the word of the Lord to the Elders of Israel
was, that they might go forth to the distant nations of the earth, that
the kingdom might roll forth, so that every heart might be penetrated.

Prior to this, my labors had been confined to my own land, in which
I had traveled about six thousand miles, preaching the gospel to the
best of my ability, and had the pleasure of baptizing several of my
countrymen for the remission of sins, and introducing them into the
kingdom which the Lord has set up in these last days.

I had frequently felt a desire to visit the shores of Europe, and
believed that the time was fast approaching when I should take leave of
my own country and lift up my voice to other nations, warning them of
the things which were coming on the earth, and making known to them the
great things which the Lord had brought to pass. Yet it never occurred
to my mind that I should be one of the first commissioned to preach the
everlasting gospel on the shores of Europe, and I can assure my friends
I was taken by surprise when I was informed by Brother Hyrum Smith,
one of the Presidency of the Church, that I had been designed by the
Spirit, and, at a conference of the authorities of the Church which had
been held, was appointed to take the charge of a mission to the kingdom
of Great Britain.

The idea of being appointed to such an important office and mission
was almost more than I could bear up under. I felt my weakness and
unworthiness, and was nearly ready to sink under the task which
devolved upon me, and I could not help exclaiming: "O Lord I am a man
of 'stammering tongue,' and altogether unfit for such a work. How can
I go to preach in that land, which is so famed throughout Christendom
for light, knowledge and piety, and as the nursery of religion; and to
a people whose intelligence is proverbial?"

Again, the idea of leaving my family for so long a time, which a
mission to that country must necessarily require--of being separated
from my friends whom I loved, and with whom I had enjoyed many
blessings and happy seasons--of leaving my native land to sojourn among
strangers in a strange land, was almost overwhelming.

However, all these considerations did not deter me from the path of
duty. Neither did I confer with flesh and blood; but the moment I
understood the will of my Heavenly Father, I felt a determination to
go at all hazards, believing that He would support me by His almighty
power, and endow me with every qualification I needed.

Although my family were dear to me, and I should have to leave them
almost destitute, I felt that the cause of truth, the gospel of Christ,
outweighed every other consideration; and I felt willing to leave them,
believing that their wants would be provided for by that God who taketh
care of sparrows and who feedeth the young ravens when they cry.

I was then set apart, along with Elder Hyde, who was likewise appointed
to that mission, by the laying on of the hands of the Presidency, who
agreed that Elders Goodson, Russell, Richards, Fielding and Snider
should accompany us.

After spending a few days in arranging my affairs and settling my
business, on the thirteenth day of June, A. D. 1837, I bade adieu to my
family and friends, and the town of Kirtland, where the house of the
Lord stood, in which I had received my anointing, and had seen such
wonderful displays of the power and glory of God. In company with Elder
Hyde and the other brethren, I arrived at Fairport, on Lake Erie, that
afternoon, a distance of twelve miles; and about an hour after our
arrival, took passage in a steam-boat for Buffalo, New York.

We were accompanied by Brother R. B. Thompson and wife, who were on
their way to Canada, from Kirtland, where he intended to labor in the
ministry.

After a pleasant voyage, we reached Buffalo the next day, at which
place we expected to get some funds which were promised us, to assist
us on our journey, but we were unfortunately disappointed.

At that time we had but very little means, but still we determined to
prosecute our journey, believing that the Lord would open our way.

We accordingly continued our journey, and took our passage in a line
boat on the Erie Canal to Utica, a distance of two hundred and fifty
miles, and thence to Albany on the railroad.

From this latter place I went with Brother Richards into the country
about thirty miles, where we were successful in obtaining some means to
enable us to prosecute our journey. We then returned and took passage
on a steamboat for New York, at which place we arrived on the 22nd day
of June.

On our arrival we met with Brothers Goodson and Snider, according to
appointment (they having gone round by the way of Canada), all in good
health.

When we arrived at New York we found a vessel ready to sail, but not
having sufficient means we were obliged to wait until such time as
we could obtain funds to pay our passage and buy provisions for the
voyage. We rented a small room in a store house, hoping that some
way would be provided for us to go forward and fulfill the mission
whereunto we were sent.

We spent considerable time while we were there in praying to our
Heavenly Father for His guidance and protection, that He would make
our way plain before us, bless us with a prosperous voyage across the
billows of the mighty ocean, and make us a blessing to each other and
to the captain and crew with whom we should sail.

During our stay in that city, we were subject to many inconveniences.
We had to lay upon the floor, and had to buy and cook our own victuals;
yet none of these things moved us, neither did we feel discouraged,
believing that the Lord would open our way and guide us to our
destination.

We conversed with many persons on the subject of the gospel, and
distributed a large number of copies of the "Prophetic Warning" among
all classes of the community; not forgetting the ministers of religion
who abound in that city. We sent a copy to every one whose name we
could ascertain through the medium of the post office.

After remaining a few days, we were presented with sixty dollars to
assist us. Brother Elijah Fordham made us a present of ten dollars,
and concluded to accompany us on our mission, but upon more mature
consideration, we thought it was best for him to stop in that place,
believing that the Lord had a people in that city, and that a Church
would be built up, which was afterwards done by the instrumentality of
Elders Parley P. and Orson Pratt.

Having obtained as much money as would pay our passage across the
Atlantic, we laid in a stock of provisions, and on the first day of
July went on board the ship _Garrick_, bound for Liverpool, and weighed
anchor about ten o'clock, a. m., and about four o'clock, p. m. of the
same day, lost sight of my native land. I had feelings which I cannot
describe when I could no longer behold its shores, and when I bade
adieu to the land of my birth, which was fast receding, I felt to
exclaim:

  "Yes, my native land, I love thee:
  All thy scenes I love them well:
  Friends, connections, happy country,
  Can I bid you all farewell?
  Can I leave you
  Far in distant lands to dwell?"

However, when I reflected on the causes which had induced me to leave
it for a while, and the work which devolved upon me I could likewise
say,

  "I go, but not to plough the main
  To ease a restless mind."

No; I hope I was actuated by a different motive than either to please
myself or to gain the riches and applause of the world; it was a
higher consideration than these that induced me to leave my home. It
was because a dispensation of the gospel had been committed to me,
and I felt an ardent desire that my fellow-creatures in other lands,
as well as those of the land of my birth, might hear the sound of the
everlasting gospel, obey its requisitions, rejoice in the fullness and
blessings thereof and escape the judgments which were threatened upon
the ungodly.

Our passage was very agreeable, and the winds for most part very
favorable. On the banks of Newfoundland we saw several whales and many
different species of fish.

We were kindly treated while on board, both by the officers and crew,
and their conduct was indeed praiseworthy; had we been their own
relatives, they could not have behaved more kindly or have treated us
better. Thus the Lord answered our prayers in this respect, for which I
desire to praise His holy name.

The Lord also gave us favor in the eyes of the passengers, who treated
us with the greatest respect. During our voyage a child belonging to
one of the passengers was very sick and was given up for dead by the
doctor who attended it; consequently, its parents had given up all
hopes of its recovery, and expected to have to commit their little
one to the ocean. Feeling a great anxiety for the child, I went to
its parents and reasoned with, and laid before them the principle of
faith, and told them that the Lord was able to restore their child,
notwithstanding there was no earthly prospect of its recovery, to
which they listened with great interest. Having an opportunity shortly
after, secretly to lay hands upon the child, I did so, and in the name
of Jesus Christ rebuked the disease which preyed upon its system. The
Spirit of the Lord attended the administration, and from that time the
child began to recover, and two or three days after it was running
about perfectly well. Its parents had to acknowledge that it was healed
by the power of the Almighty.

The last Sunday we were on the water I went to the captain and asked
the privilege for one of us to preach on board. He very obligingly
agreed, and appointed the time when it would be most suitable for
himself and the crew to attend, which was at one o'clock p. m. We then
appointed Brother Hyde to speak, and notified the crew and passengers
of the circumstance.

At the time appointed, there was a congregation of from two to three
hundred persons assembled on the deck, who listened with great
attention and deep interest to the discourse, which was delivered
with great power. I think I never heard Brother Hyde speak with
such power and eloquence as that time; he spoke on the subject of
the resurrection. The time being limited on account of the duties
of the ship's company, his subject was necessarily condensed. The
congregation was composed of persons from different nations, and of
different faiths, English, Irish, Scotch, Germans, French, etc., both
Jews and Christians. A great feeling was produced upon the minds of
the assembly, who had never heard the subject treated in like manner
before, and from the conversation we afterwards had with several of
them, I believe that good was done and many from that time began to
search the scriptures for themselves, which are able to make men wise
unto salvation.

On the 15th of July we came in sight of land, which caused joy and
gratitude to my Heavenly Father to arise in my bosom for the favorable
passage we had had so far and the prospect of soon reaching our
destination. We then sailed up the Irish channel, having Ireland on
our left and Wales on our right. The scenery was very beautiful and
imposing.

Three days after first seeing land, being the 18th of July, we arrived
in Liverpool, one of the largest ports in Great Britain, being just
seventeen days and two hours from our departure from New York. The
packet ship _South America_, which left New York the same time we did,
came in a few lengths behind. The sight was very grand to see these two
vessels enter port, with every inch of canvass spread. When we first
got sight of Liverpool, I went to the side of the vessel and poured out
my soul in praise and thanksgiving to God for the prosperous voyage
and for all the mercies which He had vouchsafed to me, and while thus
engaged, and while contemplating the scenery which then presented
itself and the circumstances which had brought me thus far, the Spirit
of the Lord rested upon me in a powerful manner; my soul was filled
with love and gratitude, and was humbled within me, while I covenanted
to dedicate myself to God and to love and serve Him with all my heart.

Immediately after we anchored, a small boat came alongside, and
several of the passengers, with Brothers Hyde, Richards, Goodson and
myself got in and went on shore. When we were within six or seven feet
from the pier, I leaped on shore, and for the first time in my life
stood on British ground, among strangers whose manners and customs
were different from my own. My feelings at that time were peculiar,
particularly when I realized the object, importance and extent of my
mission and the work to which I had been appointed and in which I was
shortly to be engaged.



CHAPTER II.

TIMIDITY AT THE THOUGHTS OF MY TASK--PROMPTED BY THE SPIRIT TO GO TO
PRESTON--THE "TRUTH WILL PREVAIL"--MEET ELDER FIELDING'S BROTHER, A
PREACHER--INVITED TO PREACH IN HIS CHAPEL--SEEING HIS CRAFT ENDANGERED,
HE CLOSES HIS DOORS AGAINST US--ANOTHER MINISTER FORBIDS US BAPTIZING
HIS CHURCH MEMBERS--DESPERATE STRUGGLE WITH EVIL SPIRITS--COMMENCE
BAPTIZING--ELDERS SEPARATE--OPPOSED BY A MINISTER--HIS SUBSEQUENT SHAME.

The idea of standing forth and proclaiming the gospel in a land so much
extolled for religion, which was constantly sending forth her ministers
to almost every nation under heaven, and among a people who, of course,
did not expect to be taught, but to teach others the principles of the
gospel, and the consciousness of my own weakness and unfitness for
such an undertaking, led me to cry mightily to the Lord for wisdom and
for that comfort and support which I so much needed. At the same time
I thought that if I could have been relieved from the responsibility
which rested upon me, by fighting Goliath on as unequal terms as David
did, I should have felt myself happy.

However, I endeavored to put my trust in God, believing that He would
assist me in publishing the truth and that He would be a present help
in the time of need.

Having no means, poor and penniless we wandered in the streets of that
great city, where wealth and luxury, penury and want abound. I there
met the rich attired in the most costly dresses, and the next moment
was saluted with the cries of the poor, who were without covering
sufficient to screen them from the weather. Such a distinction I never
saw before. We then looked out for a place to lodge in, and found a
room belonging to a widow which we engaged for a few days.

The time we were in Liverpool was spent in council and in calling on
the Lord for direction, so that we might be led to places where we
should be most useful in proclaiming the gospel and in establishing and
spreading His kingdom. While thus engaged, the Spirit of the Lord, the
mighty power of God, was with us, and we felt greatly strengthened, and
a determination to go forward, come life or death, honor or reproach,
was manifested by us all. Our trust was in God, who we believed could
make us as useful in bringing down the kingdom of Satan as He did the
rams' horns, in bringing down the walls of Jericho and in gathering
out a number of precious souls who were buried amidst the rubbish of
tradition, and who had none to show them the way of truth.

Feeling led by the Spirit of the Lord to go to Preston, a large
manufacturing town in Lancashire, we started for that place three
days after our arrival in Liverpool. We went by coach and arrived on
Saturday afternoon about four o'clock. After unloading our trunks,
Brother Goodson went in search of a place of lodging, and Brother
Fielding went to seek a brother of his, who was a minister, residing in
that place.

It being the day on which their representatives were chosen, the
streets presented a very busy scene; indeed I never witnessed anything
like it before in my life.

On one of the flags, which was just enrolled before us the moment
the coach reached its destination, was the following motto: "TRUTH
WILL PREVAIL," which was painted in large, gilt letters. It being so
very seasonable and the sentiment being so appropriate to us in our
situation, we were involuntarily led to exclaim, "Amen! So let it be."

Brother Goodson having found a room where we could be accommodated,
which belonged to a widow woman, situated in Wilford Street, we moved
our baggage there. Shortly after, Brother. Fielding returned, having
found his brother, who requested to have an interview with some of us
that evening. Accordingly, Elders Hyde, Goodson and I went and were
kindly received by him and Mr. Watson, his brother-in-law, who was
present at the time.

We gave them a short account of the object of our mission and the great
work which the Lord had commenced, and conversed upon those subjects
until a late hour. The next morning we were presented with half a
crown, which Mr. Fielding's sister had sent us.

It being Sunday, we went to hear Mr. Fielding preach. After he had
finished his discourse, and without being requested by us, he gave out
an appointment for some one of us to preach in the afternoon.

It being noised abroad that some Elders from America were in town
and were going to preach in the afternoon, a large concourse of
people assembled to hear us. It falling to my lot to speak, I called
their attention to the first principles of the gospel, and told them
something of the nature of the work which the Lord had commenced on
the earth. Brother Hyde afterwards bore testimony to the same, which I
believe was received by many with whom I afterwards conversed.

Another appointment was given out for us in the evening, at which
time Brother Goodson preached and Brother Fielding bore testimony.
An appointment was then made for us on Wednesday evening at the same
place, at which time Elder Hyde preached. A number now being convinced
of the truth, believed the testimony and began to praise God and
rejoice exceedingly that the Lord had again visited His people, and
sent His servants to lay before them the doctrine of the gospel "and
the truth as it is in Jesus."

The Rev. Mr. Fielding, who had kindly invited us to preach in his
chapel, knowing that quite a number of his members believed our
testimony and that some were wishful to be baptized, shut his doors
against us and would suffer us to preach no more in his chapel. For an
excuse, he said that we had preached the doctrine of baptism for the
remission of sins, contrary to our arrangement with him.

I need scarcely assure my friends that nothing was said to him from
which any inference could be drawn that we should suppress the doctrine
of baptism. No! We deemed it too important a doctrine to lay aside for
any privilege we could receive from mortals. Mr. Fielding understood
our doctrines even before we came there, having received several
communications from his brother Joseph, who wrote to him from Canada,
explaining the doctrines of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day
Saints. We likewise had conversed with him on the subject at our former
interview. However, he having been traditioned to believe in infant
baptism, and having preached and practiced the same a number of years,
he saw the situation he would be placed in if he obeyed the gospel.
Notwithstanding his talents and standing in society, he would have to
come into the sheepfold by the door; and after all his preaching to
others, have to be baptized himself for the remission of sins by those
who were ordained to that power.

These considerations undoubtedly had their weight upon his mind, and
caused him to act as he did, and notwithstanding his former kindness he
soon became one of our most violent opposers.

An observation which escaped his lips shortly after this circumstance,
I shall here mention. Speaking one day respecting the three first
sermons which were preached in that place, he said that "Kimball bored
the holes, Goodson drove the nails and Hyde clinched them."

However, his congregation did not follow his example; they had for some
time been praying for our coming, and had been assured by Mr. Fielding
that he could not place more confidence in an angel than he did in
the statements of his brother respecting this people. Consequently,
they were in a great measure prepared for the reception of the gospel,
probably as much so as Cornelius was anciently.

Having now no public place to preach in, we began to preach in private
houses, which were opened in every direction, while numbers believed
the gospel. After we had been in that place eight days, we began to
baptize in the name of the Lord Jesus for the remission of sins. One
"reverend" gentleman came and forbid us baptizing any of his members;
but we told him that all who were of age and requested baptism we
should undoubtedly administer that ordinance to.

One Saturday evening I was appointed by the brethren to baptize a
number the next morning in the river Ribble, which runs through that
place. By this time, the adversary of souls began to rage, and he felt
a determination to destroy us before we had fully established the
gospel in that land; and the next morning I witnessed such a scene of
satanic power and influence as I shall never forget while memory lasts.

About day-break, Brother Russell (who was appointed to preach in the
market-place that day), who slept in the second story of the house in
which we were entertained, came up to the room where Elder Hyde and I
were sleeping and called upon us to arise and pray for him, for he was
so afflicted with evil spirits that he could not live long unless he
should obtain relief.

We immediately arose, laid hands upon him and prayed that the Lord
would have mercy on His servant and rebuke the devil. While thus
engaged, I was struck with great force by some invisible power and fell
senseless on the floor as if I had been shot, and the first thing that
I recollected was, that I was supported by Brothers Hyde and Russell,
who were beseeching a throne of grace in my behalf. They then laid me
on the bed, but my agony was so great that I could not endure, and I
was obliged to get out, and fell on my knees and began to pray. I then
sat on the bed and could distinctly see the evil spirits, who foamed
and gnashed their teeth upon us. We gazed upon them about an hour and a
half, and I shall never forget the horror and malignity depicted on the
countenances of these foul spirits, and any attempt to paint the scene
which then presented itself, or portray the malice and enmity depicted
in their countenances would be vain.

I perspired exceedingly, and my clothes were as wet as if I had
been taken out of the river. I felt exquisite pain, and was in the
greatest distress for some time. However, I learned by it the power
of the adversary, his enmity against the servants of God and got some
understanding of the invisible world.

The Lord delivered us from the wrath of our spiritual enemies
and blessed us exceedingly that day, and I had the pleasure
(notwithstanding my weakness of body from the shock I had experienced)
of baptizing nine individuals and hailing them brethren in the kingdom
of God.

A circumstance took place while at the water side which I cannot
refrain from mentioning, which will show the eagerness and anxiety of
some in that land to obey the gospel. Two of the candidates who were
changing their clothes and preparing for baptism at the distance of
several rods from the place where I was standing in the water, were so
anxious to obey the gospel, that they ran with all their might to the
water, each wishing to be baptized first. The younger, being quicker on
foot than the elder, out-ran him, and came first into the water. The
circumstance reminded me of Peter and another disciple, who went to see
the sepulchre where the Savior was laid: their anxiety was so great to
find out whether He was yet there or not, that they had a race for it.

The ceremony of baptizing being somewhat novel, a large concourse of
people assembled on the banks of the river to witness the ceremony.

In the afternoon, Elder Russell preached in the market-place, standing
on a pedestal, to a very large congregation, numbers of whom were
pricked to the heart.

Thus the work of the Lord commenced in that land (notwithstanding the
rage of the adversary and his attempt to destroy us)--a work which
shall roll forth, not only in that land but upon all the face of the
earth, even "in lands and isles unknown."

The next morning we held a council, at which Elders Goodson and
Richards were appointed to go to the city of Bedford, there being a
good prospect, from the information received, of a Church being built
up in that city. Elders Russell and Snider were appointed to go to
Alston, in Cumberland, near the borders of Scotland, and Elders Hyde,
Fielding and the writer were to remain in Preston and the regions round
about.

The next day, the brethren took their departure for the different
fields of labor assigned them.

Brothers Hyde, Fielding and I continued lifting up our voices in
private houses, at the corners of the streets, in the market-place and
wherever the Lord opened a door. The following Sabbath, Elder Hyde
preached in the market-place to a numerous assemblage, both rich and
poor, who flocked from all parts to hear "what these babblers had to
say," hearing that we were "setters forth of strange doctrines." After
Brother Hyde had got through, I gave an exhortation, and when I had
concluded, a minister stepped forward to oppose us on the doctrines we
advanced, but more particularly on the doctrine of baptism, he being a
great stickler for infant baptism.

The people, thinking he intended to offend us, would not let him
proceed, but seemed determined to put him down, and undoubtedly would
have done so had not Brother Hyde interposed and begged permission for
the gentleman to speak, telling the congregation that he was prepared
to meet any arguments he might advance. This appeased the people, who
listened to the remarks of the reverend gentleman; after which Brother
Hyde spoke in answer to the objections which had been offered, to the
satisfaction of nearly all present.

The minister felt somewhat ashamed. One individual came up to him and
asked him what he now thought of his "baby baptism," while another
came, took him by the hand and led him out of the throng. Indeed, all
those who arose up to oppose the doctrines we taught were confounded,
and could not with any success combat the truths we preached.



CHAPTER III.

MEETING FOR CONFIRMATION--CONVERT AND BAPTIZE MISS RICHARDS--HER
FATHER, A MINISTER, INVITES ME TO PREACH IN HIS CHAPEL--CONGREGATION
BELIEVE MY TESTIMONY--MR. RICHARDS FRIGHTENED--CLOSES HIS CHAPEL
AGAINST ME--HIS DAUGHTER TROUBLED--I PREDICT THAT HE WILL AGAIN OPEN
HIS CHAPEL TO ME--PREDICTION FULFILLED--OTHER ELDERS ENCOURAGED BY THE
REV. MR. MATTHEWS, WHO AFTERWARDS REJECTS THEIR TESTIMONY AND COMMENCES
PREACHING THEIR DOCTRINES ON HIS OWN ACCOUNT.

Having had considerable success the short time we had labored in that
place, and having baptized a number we requested them to meet at the
house of Sister Dawson for confirmation on the evening of the second
Sabbath after our arrival in Preston.

The people having come together, we fully explained to them the nature
of that ordinance about to be performed. We then laid our hands upon
between forty and fifty for the gift of the Holy Ghost, and confirmed
them members of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints. While
attending to this ordinance the Spirit of the Lord rested down upon us
in a powerful manner, which caused us to rejoice exceedingly. Thus the
word of the Lord spread and prevailed.

About this time, a young lady, the daughter of a minister of the
Presbyterian order, who resided about fifteen miles from Preston, being
on a visit to that place, happened to be at the house of a family with
whom I was acquainted. Calling in to see them at the time she was there
I was introduced to her, and we immediately entered into conversation
on the subject of the gospel. I found her a very intelligent person,
and she seemed very desirous to hear the things I had to teach and
understand the doctrines of the gospel.

I informed her of an appointment I had made to preach that evening, and
invited her to attend. She did so, and likewise the evening following;
and after attending these two services she was fully convinced of the
truth, and the next morning sent for me, desiring to be baptized. I
cheerfully complied with her request, and confirmed her at the water
side. The following day, she started for home, requesting me to pray
for her, and gave us some encouragement to expect that her father would
open his chapel for me to preach in.

I hastened to my brethren, told them of the circumstance and the result
of my visit with the young lady, and then called upon them to unite
in prayer that the Lord would soften the heart of her father, that he
might be induced to open his chapel for us to preach in, and that our
way might be opened in that place.

The next week I received a letter from her, and one from her father,
in which he informed me that I was expected to be at his place the
following Saturday, as he had given out an appointment for me to preach
in his chapel the next Sunday. The following is a copy of the letter:

"_Sir_:--You are expected to be here next Saturday. You are given
out to preach in the forenoon, afternoon and evening. Although we
be strangers to one another, yet I hope we are not strangers to our
blessed Redeemer, else I would not have given out for you to preach;
our chapel is but little and the congregation but few--yet if one soul
be converted, it is of more value than the whole world.

I remain in haste,

JOHN RICHARDS."

Agreeable to the kind invitation, I made preparation to visit that
place, and took coach on Saturday afternoon at Preston and arrived at
his house a little before dark.

On my entering, he arose and said, "I understand you are the minister
lately from America!"

I told him I was, whereupon he bade me welcome to his house, and seemed
to rejoice at my arrival.

After receiving refreshment at his hospitable board, we commenced a
conversation which lasted till a late hour, which appeared satisfactory
to the whole family.

The next morning I accompanied the reverend gentleman to his chapel,
and at the hour appointed commenced to preach to a crowded congregation
on the principles of salvation. I likewise preached in the afternoon
and evening, and my hearers seemed to manifest great interest in the
things which I laid before them. Nearly the whole congregation shed
tears of joy.

After I had concluded the services of the day, Mr. Richards gave
out another appointment for me to preach on Monday evening, which I
attended to. I likewise, by request of the congregation, preached on
Wednesday evening.

A number now began to believe the doctrines I advanced, and on
Thursday, six individuals, all members of Mr. Richards' church, came
forward for baptism.

Mr. Richards now, seeing the effect which my preaching produced, and
fearing lest he should lose all his members and likewise the salary
which was allowed him for preaching, told me that he must close the
doors of his chapel against me; but at the same time his behavior was
kind, and to his praise be it spoken, treated me with the greatest
hospitality.

I then began to preach in private houses, which were opened in that
neighborhood, and I ceased not to declare to all who came to hear, both
by night and by day, the glorious tidings of salvation, and that God
had again restored the ordinances as at the first, and counselors as at
the beginning.

Notwithstanding Mr. Richards closed the door of his meeting house
against me, he frequently came to hear me preach.

His daughter felt very sorrowful on account of her father not allowing
me to preach any more in his place of worship, and wept much; but I
told her not to fear, for I believed that God would soften his heart
and cause him to open his chapel for me to preach in again.

During this time I was principally entertained at his house. The next
Sunday I went along with him to his meeting, feeling a desire to hear
him preach. After he had finished his discourse, I was surprised to
hear him give out another appointment for me to preach in his chapel. I
accordingly preached in the afternoon and in the evening, and the word
seemed to be with power and the effect was great upon the people. The
next day I baptized two more, both members of Mr. Richards' church.

Mr. Richards had preached in that place upwards of thirty years, and
his members, as well as the inhabitants of the place and vicinity, were
very much attached to him. Yet, when the fullness of the gospel was
preached, although in much weakness, the people, notwithstanding their
attachment and regard for their venerable pastor, being convinced of
their duty, came forward and followed the footsteps of the Savior by
being buried in the likeness of His death.

After laboring for some time in this neighborhood, I was warned by
the Spirit to return to Preston, and there found that I was anxiously
expected by the brethren. They had received letters from Brothers
Richards and Russell, which gave an account of their proceedings
since they left Preston. Brother Goodson had also returned from
Bedfordshire, where he and Brother Richards had labored, and he gave
us a relation of their mission and success. He informed us that a
minister by the name of Matthews, brother-in-law to Elder Joseph
Fielding, received them very kindly and invited them to preach in his
church. The invitation was accepted, and they preached several times.
The result was that a number, among whom was Mr. Matthews and his
lady, believed their testimony and the things which they proclaimed.
Mr. Matthews had likewise borne testimony to his congregation of the
truth of these things and that they were the same principles as taught
by the apostles in ancient days, and beseeched his church to receive
the same. Several of his members went forward and obeyed the gospel,
and the time was appointed when he was to be baptized. However, in
the interval, something had caused him to stumble, and darkness had
pervaded his mind, insomuch so that at the time specified he did not
make his appearance, but went to a Baptist minister residing in that
place whom he prevailed upon to baptize him. From that time he began to
preach baptism for the remission of sins, and no longer walked with the
Saints. However, a great part of his members left him and obeyed the
truth, and in a letter which he wrote to his brother-in-law, the Rev.
James Fielding, he stated that his best members had left him.

It would probably be well to say a few words respecting Mr. Matthews
and Mr. Fielding, and their congregations, also their situation prior
to the time the gospel saluted their ears.

Mr. Matthews, who was a gentleman of considerable learning and talents,
had been a minister in the established church of England. Seeing a
great many things in that church contrary to truth and righteousness,
and moreover, believing that an overturn was at hand, and that the
church was destitute of the gifts of the Spirit, and was not expecting
the Savior to come to reign upon the earth, as had been spoken by the
prophets, he felt led to withdraw from that body.

He consequently gave up his prospects in that connection, and began to
preach the things which he verily believed; and was instrumental in
raising up quite a church in that place.

Mr. J. Fielding had been a minister in the Methodist church, but for
some of the causes mentioned, had withdrawn from that society, and
had collected a considerable church in Preston. Those gentlemen, with
their congregations, were, I believe, diligently contending for that
faith which was once delivered to the Saints at the time we arrived,
but afterwards rejected the truth. Yet, notwithstanding they did not
obey the gospel, the greater portion of their members received our
testimony, obeyed the ordinances we taught, and are now rejoicing in
the blessings of the new and everlasting covenant.



CHAPTER IV.

THE PEOPLE EAGER TO HEAR US--WE RENT "THE COCK PIT" TO PREACH
IN--OBTAIN LICENSES TO PREACH--CONTINUED SUCCESS.

About this time, Brother Snider returned from the north, where he had
been laboring in company with Brother Russell. He stated that they had
met with considerable opposition while preaching the gospel, but that
some had obeyed the truth and that others were investigating.

After spending a few days with us, he and Brother Goodson took their
leave of us and started for Liverpool about the first of October, on
their way to America, having business of importance which called them
home.

Although we were deprived of the labors of these brethren, the work
of the Lord continued to roll forth with great power. The news of our
arrival in that city, spread both far and wide, and calls from all
quarters, to go and preach, were constantly sounding in our ears. We
labored both night and day, that we might satisfy the people, who
manifested such a desire for the truth as I never saw before.

We had to speak in small houses, to very large congregations, or else,
to large assemblies in the open air; consequently, our lungs were very
sore and our bodies considerably worn down with fatigue.

Soon after this, we obtained a large and commodious place to preach
in, called "The Cock Pit," which had formerly been used by the people
to witness cocks fight and kill one another, and where hundreds of
spectators had shouted in honor of the barbarous sport which was once
the pride of Britains. And now, instead of the huzzas of the wicked and
profane, the gospel of Christ and the voice of praise and thanksgiving
was heard there. The building had also been used for a temperance hall.

We had to pay seven shillings sterling per week for the use of it, and
two shillings per week for the lighting, it being beautifully lit up
with gas. It is situated in the center of the town, and about twenty
rods from the "old church," probably the oldest in Lancashire. This
church has twelve bells which are rung at every service, the noise of
which was so great that we were unable to proceed in our services until
they had done ringing them.

Our meeting was once disturbed by some ministers belonging to the
Methodist church; however we got our place licensed and two gentlemen,
who were constables, proffered their services to keep the peace and
protect us from any further disturbances, which they continued to do,
as long as we stayed in that land.

The effect of the gospel of Jesus Christ now began to be apparent, not
only in the hearts of believers, but likewise in the conduct of those
who rejected it and many began to threaten us with prosecution for
preaching without having a license from the authorities of the nation.

This idea of obtaining a license from the secular authorities was
somewhat novel to us, but after consulting our friends, among whom
was Mr. Richards' son, (the minister of whom I have made mention)
an attorney, practicing in that neighborhood, we found that it was
according to the laws of the land.

Brother Hyde and I then made application to the quarter sessions for
licenses and, by the assistance of Mr. Richards, obtained them.

Having now obeyed the requisitions of the law, we felt ourselves
tolerably safe, knowing that our enemies now could not lawfully make us
afraid or harm us.

Although we had many persecutors, who would have rejoiced at our
destruction and who felt a determination to overthrow the work of the
Lord, there were many who were very friendly, who would have stood by
us under all circumstances, and would not have been afraid to hazard
their lives in our behalf.

After we had labored for some time in Preston, and had baptized a
number into the kingdom of God, Brother Hyde and I went about ten
miles into the country to preach, agreeably to an invitation we had
received. We preached twice to very numerous congregations, who
paid great attention to our word, and who marveled at the things we
proclaimed. We soon returned to Preston after which I paid a visit to
the church at Walker Fold, that being the name of the place where the
Rev. Mr. Richards resided. I found the church prospering, and after
laboring a few days, several more were added. From that place I went
to Bashe Lees, where I preached, and baptized two persons. I continued
my journey thence to Ribchester, situated on the river Ribble, where I
preached to a very large congregation, and then returned to Preston.

Having had some very pressing calls to go to some villages south of
Preston, I accordingly started to visit those places, in company with
Brother F. Moon, who had been baptized a short time previous. On
arriving at our destination we gave out an appointment to preach, and,
at the time appointed, the people flocked in crowds to hear me. Among
the number were five preachers, who listened with great interest to my
discourse, and who, with the greater part of the congregation, believed
the doctrines I advanced.

The next day I went to a village called Askin, and preached in the
evening; and the following day went to Eccleston, where I had the
privilege of preaching in a Methodist chapel. The last three times
I preached I baptized ten individuals, of whom two were preachers
belonging to the Association Methodists.

After spending several days in that neighborhood I returned to Preston,
where the church had now become numerous, and with the assistance of
Elders Hyde and Fielding, proceeded to organize them. We divided the
church into several branches, and appointed proper officers to preside
over them.

Thursday evenings were appointed for prayer meetings to be held in
different parts, and Sundays for the whole church to assemble in the
Cock Pit, where the sacrament was administered, and such instructions
given as were thought necessary for their spiritual prosperity and
advantage.

While attending to this, the greatest harmony and love prevailed; and
if ever any persons received the kingdom of heaven like little children
it was those brethren.

After having attended to this duty, I again went into the country,
where I spent the principal part of my time, occasionally visiting
Preston.

During my labors, I was greatly assisted by the Spirit of the Lord, and
my soul was comforted exceedingly. Churches were raised up in different
directions, and many who had previously sat in darkness, upon them the
true light shined, and before its benign and enlightening rays, the
mists of darkness, the clouds of error and superstition fled; while
"those who murmured learned doctrine, and those who erred in spirit
came to understanding."

I was instrumental in building up churches in Eccleston, Wrightington,
Askin, Exton, Daubers Lane, Chorly, Whittle and Laland Moss, after
laboring about four weeks, and baptized upwards of one hundred persons,
which caused me to rejoice exceedingly in the God and Rock of my
salvation, that I had not to labor in vain, or spend my strength for
nought. More loving and affectionate Saints I never saw before, and
they were patterns of humility.

All the here-mentioned villages are within a very short distance of
each other, and adjacent to Preston.

After my return from those places, I took a tour to the north-east
of Preston in company with Elder Fielding, where we labored together
a short time with considerable success, and raised up churches in
Ribchester, Thomly, Soney Gate Lane and at Clitheroe, a very large
market town, containing several thousand inhabitants.

At the latter place I baptized a preacher and six members of the
Methodist church, immediately after I had preached the first time. We
likewise baptized several in the town of Waddington and Downham.

The day after we preached in Downham, we received a very pressing
invitation to preach in Chatburn, but having given out an appointment
to preach in Clitheroe that evening, I informed those who had invited
me that I would not be able to comply with their request. This did
not satisfy them, and they continued to solicit me with the greatest
importunity, until I was obliged to consent to go with them, after
requesting Elder Fielding to attend to the other appointment.

On my arrival at the village I was cordially received by the
inhabitants, who turned out in large numbers to hear me preach. I
commenced my address to them in my usual manner, and the spirit of the
Lord seemed to carry the word to the hearts of the congregation, who
listened with great attention, and received the ingrafted word, which
was able to make them wise unto salvation.

Being satisfied in my mind, from the witness of the spirit, that
numbers were believing, I gave an opportunity to those who wished
to obey the gospel to do so, and immediately repaired to the water,
although it was late in the evening. Before I was done I baptized
twenty-five for the remission of their sins, and was engaged in this
pleasing duty until one o'clock, the next morning.

After being absent from Preston about seven days, in which time we had
added eighty-three souls to the Church, we returned, praising God for
all His mercies, and for visiting our labors with such abundant success.

  "No harvest joy can equal theirs
  Who see the fruit of all their cares."



CHAPTER V.

FIRST CONFERENCE IN ENGLAND--WORD OF WISDOM FIRST TAUGHT THERE--ENEMIES
ACTIVE--URGENT INVITATION FROM A BAPTIST CHURCH--THE EFFECT OF OUR
PREACHING.

It being near Christmas, we agreed to hold a general conference in
Preston on Christmas day, there being business of importance to the
churches to be attended to; and likewise several to be ordained to the
ministry.

On Christmas day, the Saints assembled in the Cock Pit, and we then
opened the conference, which was the first that was held by the Church
of Christ in that country. There were about three hundred Saints
present on the occasion, all of whom with the exception of three had
been baptized within a very short time. Elders Hyde, Fielding and
myself were present.

The brethren were instructed in the principles of the gospel, and their
several duties enjoined upon them, as Saints of the Most High. We then
proceeded to ordain several of the brethren to the Lesser Priesthood,
to take charge of the different branches where they resided. We
confirmed fourteen who had previously been baptized, and blessed about
one hundred children.

At this conference, the Word of Wisdom was first publicly taught in
that country; having previously taught it more by example than precept;
and, from my own observation afterwards, I am happy to state that it
was almost universally attended to by the brethren.

The Spirit of the Lord was with us during our interview, and truly the
hearts of the Elders were rejoiced beyond measure when we contemplated
the glorious work which had begun. We had to exclaim, "It is the Lord's
doings, and it is marvelous in our eyes! Blessed be the name of the
Lord!"

I felt greatly humbled before the Lord, who had crowned our labors with
such signal success, and had prospered us far beyond my most sanguine
expectations.

Immediately after this conference, Elder Hyde and I went to a village
called Longton, situated near the sea-shore, where we raised the
standard of truth, and published to the listening crowds, the glad
tidings of salvation. After delivering two discourses, several came to
us and requested baptism. It being very cold weather, insomuch that
the streams were all frozen up, we had to repair to the sea-shore to
administer that ordinance, and immersed fifteen in the waters of the
ocean.

It would probably be too tedious, to enumerate all the particulars
which occurred during the time we sojourned in that country; I shall
therefore pass over many events which, though pleasing to us at that
time, and which showed the kind dealings of our Heavenly Father, would
not be sufficiently interesting to others. I shall therefore content
myself by giving an outline of the principal circumstances attending
our mission, which I have no doubt will be pleasing to the brethren,
and to all who love the prosperity of Zion.

From this time, until about five weeks previous to our departure from
that land, we were continually engaged in the work of the ministry,
proclaiming the everlasting gospel in all the region round about,
and baptizing all such as believed the gospel and repented of their
sins. And truly, "the Lord of Hosts was with us, the God of Jacob was
our refuge." The Holy Ghost the Comforter was given to us and abode
with us in a remarkable manner, while the people thronged to hear
our addresses, and "numbers were added to the church daily, such as
should be saved." We would baptize as many as fifty in Preston in a
week, exclusive of those in the country. During one short mission
which Brother Hyde and I took into the country, after preaching five
discourses on the principles of our holy religion, we had the pleasure
of immersing one hundred and thirty in the waters of baptism.

Thus mightily ran the word of God and prospered to the joy and comfort
of His servants, and to the salvation of precious and immortal souls;
while the world was struck with amazement and surprise at the things
which they saw and heard. During this state of things, our enemies were
not idle, but heaped abuse upon us with an unsparing hand, and issued
torrents of lies after us, which, however, I am thankful to say, did
not sweep us away.

Among those most active in publishing falsehoods against us and the
truth, were many of the reverend clergy, who were afraid to meet us
face to face in honorable debate, although particularly requested so
to do, but sought every opportunity to destroy our characters, and
propagate their lies concerning us, thus giving testimony that "they
loved darkness rather than light."

Although we frequently called upon the ministers of the different
denominations, who had taken a stand against us, to come forward
and investigate the subject of our religion before the world in an
honorable manner, and bring forth their strong reasons to disprove
the things we taught, and convince the people by sound argument and
the word of God, if they could, that we did not preach the gospel of
Christ, they altogether declined.

This course we felt moved upon by the Spirit to adopt; but they kept
at a respectful distance, and only came out when we were absent, with
misrepresentations and abuse. It is true we suffered some from the
statements which they thought proper to make, when we could get no
opportunity to contradict them; but generally their reports were of
such a character that they carried along with them their own refutation.

The time when we expected to return to our native land, having now
nearly arrived, it was thought necessary to spend the short time we
had to remain in that country in visiting and organizing the churches;
placing such officers over them, and giving such instructions as would
be beneficial to them during our absence. Accordingly, Brothers Hyde,
Fielding and I entered upon this duty, and we visited a Church nearly
every day, and imparted such instructions as the Spirit directed.
We first visited the Churches south of Preston, and after spending
some time in that direction we journeyed to the north, accompanied by
Brother Richards, who had just returned from the city of Bedford.

While we were attending to our duties in that section, we received a
very pressing invitation from a Baptist church, through the medium
of their deacon, to pay them a visit, stating that the society was
exceedingly anxious to hear from our own lips, the wonderful things we
had proclaimed in the regions round about.

We endeavored to excuse ourselves from going, as our engagements
already were such that it would require the short time we had to stay
to attend to them. But they seemed determined to take no denial, and
plead with us with such earnestness that we could not resist their
entreaties, and finally we consented to go and preach once.

Having arrived at the place, we found a large congregation already
assembled in the Baptist chapel, anxiously awaiting our arrival. The
minister gave out the hymns for us, and Elder Hyde spoke on the subject
of the resurrection with great effect; after which the minister gave
out another hymn which was sung by the assembly, and then he requested
me to address them. I arose and spoke briefly on the first principles
of the gospel.

During the services the congregation were overjoyed, the tears ran
down their cheeks, and the minister could not refrain from frequently
clapping his hands together for joy while in the meeting. After
the service was over he took us to his house, where we were very
kindly entertained. After partaking of his hospitality he with some
more friends, accompanied us to our lodgings, where we remained in
conversation until a very late hour.

The next morning while we were preparing to depart we were waited upon
by several of the citizens, who requested us to preach again that day,
stating that great interest was felt by the inhabitants, many of whom
were in tears, fearing they should hear us no more; and that a number
of influential men, had suspended operations in their factories, to
allow their workmen the privilege of hearing us preach. But we were
obliged to deny them, as it was necessary to attend to the appointments
we had previously made. We could scarcely tear ourselves away from
them, and when we did so they wept like little children. Such a desire
to hear the gospel, I never saw equalled before.

After commending them to the grace and mercy of God, we went to
Downham, where we preached in the afternoon, after which forty came
forward and were baptized. In the evening we called the churches of
Chatburn and Downham together, and after confirming forty-five who had
previously been baptized, we appointed priests, teachers and deacons to
preside over them.



CHAPTER VI.

IMPRESSED TO VISIT DOWNHAM AND CHATBURN--BAD CHARACTER OF THOSE
PLACES--WARNED AGAINST GOING--JOY WITH WHICH THE GOSPEL WAS
RECEIVED--THE PEOPLE EAGER TO BE BAPTIZED--LOTH TO PART WITH ME--VAIN
OPPOSITION FROM A MINISTER--AFFECTING CONDUCT OF LITTLE CHILDREN.

There being something interesting in the establishing of the gospel
in Downham and Chatburn, I will relate the circumstances of my visit
to those places, and the prospect we had of success prior to our
proclaiming the truth to them.

Having been preaching in the neighborhood of these villages, I felt it
my duty to pay them a visit and tell them my mission. I mentioned my
desires to several of the brethren, but they endeavored to dissuade me
from going, informing me that there could be no prospect of success, as
several ministers of different denominations had endeavored to raise
churches in these places, and had frequently preached to them, but to
no effect. They had resisted all the efforts and withstood the attempts
of all sects and parties for thirty years, and the preachers had given
them up to the hardness of their hearts. I was also informed that they
were very wicked places and the inhabitants were hardened against the
gospel.

However, this did not discourage me in the least, believing that the
gospel of Jesus Christ could reach the heart when the gospels of men
were found abortive. I consequently told those who tried to dissuade me
from going that these were the places I wanted to go to, and that it
was my business "not to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance."

Accordingly I went in the name of the Lord Jesus Christ, and I soon
procured a large barn to preach in, which was crowded to excess. Having
taken my stand in the middle of the congregation so that all might be
able to hear, I commenced my discourse, spoke with great simplicity
on the subject of the gospel of our Lord and Savior Jesus Christ,
the conditions of pardon for a fallen world, and the privileges and
blessings of all those who embraced the truth. I likewise said a little
on the subject of the resurrection.

My remarks were accompanied by the spirit of the Lord and were received
with joy, and these people, who were represented as being so hard and
obdurate, were melted with tenderness and love, and such a feeling was
produced as I never saw before; and the effect seemed to be general.

I then told them that, being a servant of the Lord Jesus Christ, I
stood ready at all times to administer the ordinances of the gospel.
After I had concluded, I felt some one pulling at my coat. I turned
around and asked the person what it was he desired. The answer was
"Please, sir, will you baptize me?" "and me!" "and me!" exclaimed more
than a dozen voices.

We accordingly went down into the water, and before I left, I baptized
twenty-five for the remission of sins--and was thus engaged until four
o'clock the next morning.

Another evening the congregation was so numerous that I had to preach
in the open air, and took my stand on a stone wall, and afterwards
baptized a number.

These towns seemed to be affected from one end to the other; parents
called their children together, spoke to them of the subjects upon
which I had preached, and warned them against swearing and all other
evil practices, and instructed them in their duty, etc. Such a scene
I presume was never witnessed in this place before; the hearts of the
people appeared to be broken, and the next morning they were all in
tears, thinking they should see my face no more. When I left them my
feelings were such as I cannot describe. As I walked down the street,
followed by numbers, the doors were crowded by the inmates of the
houses, waiting to bid us a last farewell, who could only give vent to
their grief in sobs and broken accents.

While contemplating this scene we were induced to take off our hats,
for we felt as if the place was holy ground. The Spirit of the Lord
rested down upon us, and I was constrained to bless that whole region
of country.

We were followed a considerable distance from the villages by a great
number, who could hardly separate themselves from us. My heart was like
unto theirs, and I almost thought my head was a fountain of tears, for
I wept for several miles after I bid them adieu.

Some things transpired while I was in England which may be considered
of but little importance by the world, but which will no doubt be
appreciated by the Saints, who can not only mark the providence of God
as displayed in nations and kingdoms, but can observe its workings in
private life, and in affairs of but apparent small moment.

Soon after our arrival in England a great many of the "Aikenites"
embraced the gospel, which caused considerable ill feeling and
opposition among the ministers belonging to that sect.

Having lost quite a number, and seeing that many more were on the eve
of being baptized, one of the ministers came to Preston and announced
that he was going to put down "Mormonism," expose the doctrines and
overthrow the Book of Mormon. He made a very long oration on the
subject, and was very vehement in his manner, and pounded the Book of
Mormon, which he held in his hand, on the pulpit a great many times.
He then exhorted the people to pray that the Lord would drive us from
their coasts, and if the Lord would not hear them in that petition,
that he would smite the leaders.

The next Sunday Elder Hyde and I, being in Preston, went to our meeting
and read the 13th chapter of Corinthians. We strongly urged upon the
Saints the grace of charity, which is so highly spoken of in that
chapter, and took the liberty of making some remarks on the proceedings
of Mr. Aiken, the gentleman who had abused us and the Book of Mormon so
very much a few days before. In return for his railing, we exhorted our
people to pray that the Lord would soften his heart and open his eyes,
that he might see that it was "hard to kick against the pricks."

The discourse had a very good effect, and that week we had the pleasure
of baptizing about fifty into the kingdom of Jesus Christ, a large
number of whom were members of Mr. Aiken's church.

Thus the Lord blessed us exceedingly, notwithstanding the railing and
abuse of the priests, and all things worked together for our good and
the advancement of the cause of truth.

I cannot refrain from relating a circumstance which took place, while
Brother Fielding and I were passing through the village of Chatburn;
having been observed drawing nigh to the town, the news ran from house
to house, and immediately on our arrival, the noise of their looms was
hushed, the people flocked to the doors to welcome us, and see us pass.
The youth of the place ran to meet us, and took hold of our mantles and
then of each other's hands. Several, having hold of hands, went before
us, singing the songs of Zion, while their parents gazed upon the scene
with delight, poured out their blessings upon our heads, and praised
the God of heaven for sending us to unfold the principles of truth and
the plan of salvation to them.

Such a scene, and such gratitude, I never witnessed before. "Surely,"
my heart exclaimed, "out of the mouths of babes and sucklings, thou has
perfected praise!"

What could have been more pleasing and delightful than such a
manifestation of gratitude to Almighty God from those whose hearts
were deemed too hard to be penetrated by the gospel, and who had been
considered the most wicked and hardened people in that region of
country!

In comparison to the joy I then experienced, the grandeur, pomp and
glory of the kingdoms of this world shrank into insignificance and
appeared as dross, and all the honor of man, aside from the gospel, to
be vain.



CHAPTER VII.

VISIT TO THE MOON FAMILY--PREJUDICED AGAINST OUR DOCTRINE--A PROPHECY
ABOUT THEM--IMPRESSED TO CALL AT THEIR HOUSE AGAIN--MY PRESENCE HAILED
WITH JOY AS AN ANSWER TO PRAYER--THE PROPHECY FULFILLED: THEY JOIN THE
CHURCH--A DREAM AND ITS INTERPRETATION.

Having an appointment to preach in the village of Wrightington, while
on the way I stopped at the house of Brother Amos Fielding. When I
arrived he informed me that a certain family by the name of Moon had
sent a request by him for me to visit them, that they might have
the privilege of conversing with me on the subject of the gospel.
Accordingly, Brother Fielding and I paid them a visit that evening.

We were very kindly received by the family, and had considerable
conversation on the object of my mission to that country, and the great
work of the last days. They listened with attention to my statements,
but they appeared to be prejudiced against them rather than otherwise.
We remained in conversation until a late hour, and then returned.

On our way home, Brother Fielding observed that he thought our visit
had been in vain, as the family seemed to have considerable prejudice.
I replied, "Brother Fielding, be not faithless, but believing; we shall
yet see great effects from this visit, for I know there are some of the
family who have received the testimony and will shortly manifest the
same."

At this remark he appeared surprised.

The next morning I continued my journey to Wrightington, and after
spending two or three days in that vicinity, preaching the gospel, I
returned by the way of Brother Fielding's, with whom I again tarried
for the night.

The next morning I commenced my journey, intending to go direct to
Preston, but when I got opposite the road leading to Mr. Moon's, I
was forcibly impressed by the Spirit of the Lord to call and see them
again. I could not resist, and therefore directed my steps to the
house, not knowing what it meant.

On my arrival at the house, I knocked at the door, and Mrs. Moon from
within exclaimed, "Come in! come in! you are welcome here! I and the
lasses (meaning her daughters) have just been calling on the Lord, and
praying that He would send you this way."

She then informed me of her state of mind since I was there before,
and said she at first rejected my testimony, and endeavored to think
lightly of the things I had advanced, but on trying to pray, she said
that "the heavens seemed to be like brass over her head, and it was
like iron under her feet." She did not know what was the matter, and
exclaimed, "Certainly the man has not bewitched me!"

Upon inquiry she found it was the same with the "lasses." They had
begun to reflect on the things I had told them, and, thinking it
possible that I had told them the truth, they resolved to lay the case
before the Lord, and beseech Him to give them a testimony concerning
the things I had testified of.

She then observed, that as soon as they did so, light broke in upon
their minds, they were convinced that I was a messenger of salvation,
and that it was the work of the Lord; and they had resolved to obey the
gospel, which they did, for that evening I baptized father and mother
and four of their daughters.

Shortly after I visited them again, and baptized the remainder of the
family, consisting of thirteen souls, the youngest of whom was over
twenty years of age. They received the gospel as little children,
and rejoiced exceedingly in its blessings. The sons were very good
musicians, and the daughters excellent singers, and when they united
their instruments and their voices in the songs of Zion, the effect was
truly transporting.

Before I left England, there were about thirty of that family and
connections baptized, six of whom were ordained to be fellow-laborers
with us in the vineyard, and I left them rejoicing in the truths they
had embraced.

One night, while at the village of Rochester, I dreamed that I, in
company with another person, was walking out, and saw a very extensive
field of wheat, more so than the eye could reach. Such a sight I never
before witnessed. The wheat appeared to be perfectly ripe, and ready
for harvest. I was very much rejoiced at the glorious sight which
presented itself; but judge of my surprise, when, on taking some of the
ears and rubbing them in my hands, I found nothing but smut. I marveled
exceedingly, and felt very sorrowful, and exclaimed, "What will the
people do for grain; here is a great appearance of plenty, but there is
no sound wheat!"

While contemplating the subject, I looked in another direction, and saw
a small field in the form of the letter L, which had the appearance of
something growing in it. I immediately directed my steps to it, and
found that it had been sown with wheat, some of which had grown about
six inches high, other parts of the field not quite so high, and some
had only just sprouted. This gave me great encouragement to expect that
at the harvest there would be some good grain. While thus engaged, a
large bull, very fierce and angry, leaped over the fence, ran through
the field, and stamped down a large quantity of that which had just
sprouted, and after doing considerable injury he leaped over the fence
and ran away.

I felt very much grieved, that so much wheat should be destroyed, when
there was such a prospect of scarcity. When I awoke next morning, the
interpretation was given me. The large field with the great appearance
of grain, so beautiful to look upon, represented the nation in which I
then resided, which had a very pleasing appearance and a great show of
religion, and made great pretensions to piety and godliness, but denied
the power thereof. It was destitute of the principles of truth, and
consequently of the gifts of the spirit.

The small field I saw clearly represented the region of country where
I was laboring, and where the word of truth had taken root, and was
growing in the hearts of those who had the gospel, some places having
grown a little more than others. The village I was in, was that part
of the field where the bull did so much injury, for during my short
visit there, most of the inhabitants were believing, but as soon as
I departed, a clergyman belonging to the church of England, came out
and violently attacked the truth, and made considerable noise, crying,
"false prophet! delusion!" and after trampling on truth, and doing
all the mischief he could, before I returned, he took shelter in his
pulpit. However, he did not destroy all the seed, for after my return I
was instrumental in building up a church in that place.



CHAPTER VIII.

EXTRAORDINARY SUCCESS--VERY COLD WEATHER--SCENES OF SUFFERING--OUR
EXCESSIVE LABORS--A GENERAL CONFERENCE--FAREWELL MEETING--AFFECTION
MANIFESTED FOR US--ELDER RUSSELL'S LABORS--ELDER GOODSON A BARRIER.

It being known that we had but a short time to remain in that country,
great numbers flocked to hear us preach, and many were baptized.
Some days we went from house to house, conversing with the people on
the things of the kingdom, and by such a course were instrumental in
convincing many of the truth. I have known as many as twenty persons
baptized in one day who have been convinced on such occasions. They
were like Lydia of old, "who gladly received the word." I have had
to go into the water to administer the ordinance of baptism six or
seven times in a day, and frequently after having come out of the
water and changed my clothes, I have had to return again before I
reached my home; this, too, when the weather was extremely cold, the
ice being from twelve to fourteen inches thick, which continued so
about twelve weeks, during which time I think there were but ten days,
in which we were not in the water. "The harvest was indeed plenteous
but the laborers were few." This was very extraordinary weather for
that country; as I was informed that some winters they had scarcely
any frost or snow, and the oldest inhabitants told me that they never
experienced such a winter before. In consequence of the inclemency
of the weather, several manufacturing establishments were shut up,
children were thrown out of employment, whose sufferings during that
time were severe, and I was credibly informed, and verily believe, that
numbers perished from starvation. Such sufferings I never witnessed
in my life before, and the scenes which I daily beheld while in that
country almost chilled the blood in my veins. The streets were crowded
with men, women and children, who solicited alms from the passengers as
they walked along. Numbers of those poor wretches were without shoes
or stockings, and had scarcely any covering to screen them from the
inclemency of the weather.

Oh! when will distress and poverty and pain cease, and peace and plenty
abound? When the Lord Jesus shall descend in the clouds of heaven--when
the rod of the oppressor shall be broken. "Hasten the time, O Lord!"
was frequently the language of my heart, when I contemplated the
scenes of wretchedness and woe, which I daily witnessed, and my prayer
to my Heavenly Father was, that if I had to witness a succession of
such scenes of wretchedness and woe, that He would harden my heart,
for those things were too much for me to bear. This is no exaggerated
account; I have used no coloring here. They are facts which will meet
the Elders of Israel when they shall go forth into that land, and then
I can assure them they will not be surprised at my feelings.

But to return. During this time not only were great numbers initiated
into the kingdom of heaven, but those who were sick were healed, and
those who were diseased flocked to us daily; and truly their faith
was great, such as I hardly ever witnessed before, consequently many
were healed of their infirmities and sickness. We were continually
employed, and scarcely gave sleep to our eyes, and some nights we would
hardly close them. The task was almost more than we could endure, but
realizing the circumstances of this people, their love of the truth,
their humility and unfeigned charity, we were constrained to use all
diligence and make good use of every moment of time, for truly our
bowels yearned over them.

Notwithstanding our unwearied and unceasing labors, we could not fill
the calls we had from day to day, for the work kept spreading, the
prospect for usefulness grew brighter and brighter, and the field
opened larger and larger.

The reader will not, I think, accuse me of egotism, when I say that
we were diligent; for I do not remember of retiring to my bed earlier
than twelve o'clock p. m. during the last six months I spent in that
country, which was also the case with Brothers Hyde and Fielding.
Brother Hyde was laid up with sickness about six weeks, on account of
his excessive labors, from which however he was happily restored.

On the eighth day of April, A. D. 1838, it being Sunday, and the time
appointed for a general conference of the Saints in that kingdom, and
the day previous to our departure from them, they began to assemble
at an early hour in the morning, and by nine o'clock there were from
six to seven hundred of the Saints assembled from various parts of the
country.

Believing it necessary for the good of the kingdom to have some one to
preside over the whole mission, we nominated Brother Joseph Fielding
to be appointed to that office, and Brother Levi Richards and William
Clayton to be his counselors. The nominations met with the approbation
of the whole assembly, who agreed to harken to their instructions
and uphold them in their offices. These brethren were then, with
eight Elders, several Priests, Teachers and Deacons, set apart and
ordained to the several offices to which they were called. One of the
brethren who was ordained was going to Manchester, one of the largest
manufacturing towns in England, and another to the city of London, and
they undoubtedly would carry the glad tidings of salvation to those
places.

We then laid hands upon forty individuals, who had previously been
baptized, for the gift of the Holy Ghost, after which about one hundred
children were presented to us to receive a blessing, and the same day
we baptized about twenty individuals for the remission of sins, and
then proceeded to administer the sacrament to this numerous assembly.
We then gave some general instructions to the whole Church respecting
their duty to God and to one another, which were listened to with great
attention and were treasured up in the hearts of most who were present.

At five o'clock, p. m., we brought the conference to a close, it
having continued without intermission from nine o'clock, a. m. We then
appointed seven o'clock the same evening to deliver our farewell
addresses.

At the time appointed we repaired to the meeting, which was crowded
to excess. Brother Hyde and myself then spoke to them respecting our
labors in that land, the success of our ministry and the kindness we
had experienced at their hands; told them that we hoped before long to
see them again, after we had visited the Church and our families in
America; but when we spoke of our departure their hearts were broken
within them. They gave vent to their feelings and wept like children,
and broke out in cries like the following: "How can we part with our
beloved brethren!" "We may never see them again!" "O why can you leave
us!" etc. I could not refrain; my feelings only found vent in a flood
of tears.

Some persons may be disposed to accuse me of weakness on this occasion,
but if any should do so, I would say that I do not envy any man's
feelings who could witness such a scene with all its associations, and
the finer feelings of his heart not be touched on such an occasion;
indeed it would have been almost an impossibility for us to have left
this dear and affectionate people had we not had the most implicit
confidence in the brethren who were appointed to preside over them in
our absence; but knowing their faith and virtuous conversation, and
that they had the confidence of the Church, we felt assured that the
affairs of the Church would be conducted in righteousness; consequently
we left them under different feelings than we otherwise could have done.

Immediately after dismissing we met the official members, the number
of whom were eighty, at a private house and instructed them further in
their duties, and dismissed them at one o'clock the next morning.

This was certainly one of the most interesting conferences I ever
attended. The services were calculated to convince the honest and give
joy to Saints, and will long be remembered by all those who attended,
and I have no doubt was the means of great and lasting good.

At this conference we were favored with the company of Elders Isaac
Russell and Willard Richards. The latter had returned from the County
of Bedford, where he had been proclaiming the gospel. In consequence
of sickness his labors had not been so extensive as they otherwise
would have been, and were confined within a short distance from the
city of Bedford, where he raised up two small branches, which he set
in order and ordained one Elder and other officers. He labored under
considerable difficulty in consequence of the conduct of Elder Goodson,
who accompanied him on that mission, who taught many things which were
not in wisdom, which proved a barrier to the spread of the truth in
that region. Elder Russell had returned from a mission to the north,
having been laboring in the County of Cumberland, near the borders of
Scotland, where numbers of his friends resided. While he was there he
met with considerable opposition, even from those of his own family, as
well as the ministers of the different denominations, who sought every
opportunity to block up his way and to destroy his influence.

However, notwithstanding the great opposition, he was instrumental in
bringing upwards of sixty souls into the kingdom of God, and left them
rejoicing in the truth and strong in the faith of the gospel.

Thus the great work which is to go through the length and breadth of
that land which will cause the hearts of thousands to rejoice, and the
poor and meek to increase their joy in the Lord; which shall lead the
honest-hearted to the foundation of truth; which shall prepare a holy
company from that nation to meet the Lord Jesus when He shall descend
from the mansions of glory and from the regions that are not known;
which shall cause thousands to rail against the doctrines of Christ and
His servants, and persecute the honest-in-heart; which shall prepare
the ungodly for the day of vengeance of our God, and shall bind them
together in the cords of darkness, was commenced in three places, viz:
Preston, Bedford and Alston, which forcibly reminds me of the parable
of the leaven which the woman cast into the three measures of meal.



CHAPTER IX.

OUR LODGINGS--WANTS SUPPLIED BY LIBERALITY OF SAINTS--JOURNEY
TO LIVERPOOL--CONTRAST BETWEEN ARRIVAL AND DEPARTURE--RETURN
VOYAGE--MEETING WITH ELDERS AND SAINTS AT NEW YORK--ARRIVAL AT KIRTLAND.

During our stay in Preston, we made our home at the house of Sister
Dawson, in Pole Street. We purchased our provisions, and she cooked
them for us, which is quite customary in that country. For our room,
lodging and cooking and a good coal fire, we each paid the sum of two
shillings sterling per week, which is but little more than half the
usual charge. Sister Dawson was very kind to us. Indeed the hearts
of all the Saints were open to liberality, and according to their
circumstances they contributed liberally of their substance, and many
blessings of a temporal nature we received from them, for which I pray
that my Heavenly Father may reward them a hundred fold in this world,
and in the world to come with life everlasting.

During the time we labored in England, we made no public contributions
except for the poor. When we were about taking our departure, the
Church, knowing that we had no means to carry us to our native
land, with a liberality characteristic of them, contributed to our
necessities and provided us with means to take us as far as Kirtland,
Ohio. The next day, being the ninth of April, we engaged our passage
to Liverpool in a coach, which was to start at twelve o'clock the
same day. At the time appointed we were at the place of starting, and
were soon surrounded with the brethren, who felt determined to see us
leave, many of whose countenances clearly showed their sorrow at our
departure. However, we had to bid them farewell, and were soon out of
sight. Their eyes followed us as long as they could see us.

Notwithstanding the variegated scenery of the country, which in
England is very beautiful, my mind reverted back to the time when I
first arrived in that country, and the peculiar feelings I had when
I traveled from Liverpool to Preston some months before. Then I was
a stranger in a strange land, and had nothing to rely upon but the
kindness and mercy of that God who had sent me there. While I mused
on these things my soul was humbled within me, and I had to exclaim,
"Surely this is the Lord's doings, and marvelous in my eyes!" for then
I had hundreds of brethren to whom I was united in bonds the most
endearing and sacred, and who loved me as their own souls, and whose
prayers would be continually offered up for my welfare and prosperity.

After a ride of about four hours, we arrived at Liverpool and
ascertained that the ship in which we intended to sail would not leave
that port as early as we expected, in consequence of a great storm
which had taken place, in which several vessels had been wrecked and
a number of lives lost. We took lodgings a few days until the vessels
should depart.

While in Liverpool, we were waited upon by Elders Fielding and
Richards, who, feeling desirous to obtain all the information they
could procure respecting the government of the church, thought that it
would be a favorable time to do so, as our opportunities of instruction
had been but limited while in Preston, and it being almost impossible
to have much private intercourse, there being so many who wished to
converse with us on the subject of the gospel, etc. But in this thing
they were disappointed, for as soon as it was known in Preston and
regions round about that our departure was delayed, numbers of the
brethren came from thence to visit us in Liverpool before we left their
shores.

On the 20th, we went on board the ship _Garrick_ (the same ship in
which we came), bound for New York, and the same day got under way.
Soon after we left Liverpool a great storm came on, with a head
wind, and continued without cessation for several days, which did
considerable damage to the vessel. The bowsprit was broken twice by the
force of the wind with only the gib sail set. The boom likewise came
down with great force near the place where the captain was standing,
but he fortunately escaped without injury. Several other parts of the
rigging were much torn and injured. During the time the storm lasted,
Brothers Hyde and Russell were very sick. After this we had more
favorable weather.

When we had been on the water two weeks, I asked permission of the
captain for one of us to preach, which request was cheerfully complied
with, and the second cabin was prepared for the occasion. Brother
Russell preached, after which Brother Hyde made some observations. The
discourses were listened to with great attention, and the congregation
appeared very much satisfied.

The Lord gave us favor in the eyes of the captain and the passengers,
who treated us with respect and kindness. Those who were in the same
cabin with ourselves, and with whom we had more frequent opportunities
of conversing, treated us like brothers, and took pleasure in
administering to our wants, and told us if they had anything we needed
it was at our service. I hardly ever remembered traveling with more
agreeable or kind-hearted people, and I pray that the Lord may bless
them abundantly and reward them a hundred fold for all the kindness
shown to His servants.

Nothing very particular occurred during the remainder of the passage.
The weather for the most part was favorable. On the twelfth day of
May we came in sight of New York, and in the evening we secured a
landing, after a passage of twenty-two and one-half days. The ship _New
England_, which left Liverpool on the same day we did, came in about
one hour afterwards.

The sight of my native land filled my soul with gladness. We then
went into the city with several of the passengers, who purchased some
refreshments, and after we returned bade us partake with them, and we
rejoiced together. We then bowed before the Lord and offered up the
gratitude of our hearts for all His mercies, in prospering us in our
mission and bringing us safely across the mighty deep, to behold once
more the land of our nativity, and the prospect of soon embracing our
families and friends.

The next morning we went in search of Brother Fordham, whom we found
after some trouble. He was rejoiced to see us and immediately took us
to the house of Brother Mace, where we were glad to see our beloved
Brother Orson Pratt, who was then laboring in that city, and who
with Elder Parley P. Pratt, his brother, had been instrumental in
bringing many into the kingdom in that city, which intelligence gave us
great joy, for when we left New York for England, there was only one
belonging to the church in that city.

It being Sunday, we accompanied the Brothers Pratt to the house where
the Saints were accustomed to assemble for worship. On entering the
house we found about eighty persons assembled, all of whom had recently
joined the Church. After singing and prayer, I was requested to give
an account of our mission to England. I accordingly arose and told
them the things which had happened to us since our departure, and the
great and glorious work which our Heavenly Father had commenced on the
islands of the sea, and the great desire of the English to hear the
things which the Lord had brought to pass on this continent, and their
ready reception of the truth of the gospel.

The information gave great joy to the Saints, and they united with
us in praising the name of the Lord for His wonderful works for the
children of men.

In the evening Elders Russell and Hyde preached, and a great effect was
produced, and some came forward and offered themselves as candidates
for baptism.

The short time we were in New York was spent very agreeably with the
Saints, who were indeed a kind and affectionate people. The next day
we bade adieu to the brethren and commenced our journey to Kirtland by
steamboat and railroad, and arrived there on the twenty-second day of
May, A. D 1838, having been absent eleven months and nine days.



CHAPTER X.

REMOVAL TO MISSOURI--SICKNESS--KINDNESS OF THE SAINTS AT FAR
WEST--BUILD A HOUSE, AND THEN HAVE TO ABANDON IT--BATTLE OF CROOKED
RIVER--DEATH AND FINAL TESTIMONY OF APOSTLE DAVID W. PATTEN--CORNER
STONE OF TEMPLE AT FAR WEST LAID--REMOVAL TO ILLINOIS.

I found my family in good health, and as comfortably situated as I
could expect; and our joy was mutual. The Saints in Kirtland also
received us with joy and welcomed us home.

But my journey was not yet ended. Soon after my arrival in Kirtland,
I had to make preparation to move to the State of Missouri, where the
greater part of the Church had already gone. One great cause of their
removal to the west, was the persecutions to which they were subject
in Kirtland. The brethren who yet resided there, although very kind
and affectionate, were weak in the faith in consequence of trials and
temptations. This caused us to grieve exceedingly, and we resolved to
cheer them up as much as we possibly could.

Being solicited to preach in the house or the Lord, we did so, and
after preaching a few times, and recounting our travels and the great
success which had attended our labors, and also the marvelous work
which the Lord had commenced and was still carrying on in the old
country, they began to take courage, their confidence increased, and
their faith was strengthened, and they again realized the blessings of
Jehovah.

As soon as our circumstances would permit, we commenced our journey to
the State of Missouri, by water, a distance of nearly eighteen hundred
miles. After enduring considerable fatigue, we arrived safely at Far
West, on the 25th of July. We had the pleasure of beholding the faces
of numbers of our friends and brethren, some of whom were so glad to
see us that tears started in their eyes when we took them by the hand.

There is indeed something peculiarly pleasing to the Saint, who,
after a long separation, beholds the friends to whom he is united
in bonds the most sacred, and with whom he has probably traveled to
preach the gospel, and with them passed through many scenes of sorrow
and affliction. At that time every pleasing association is revived,
and memory fondly clings to those scenes, the contemplation of which
affords pleasure, while every thing of an opposite nature is forgotten
and buried in oblivion.

During our journey from Kirtland to Missouri, the weather was
remarkably warm, in consequence of which I suffered very much, and my
body was broken down by sickness, and I continued very feeble for a
considerable length of time.

The first Sunday after my arrival at Far West I was called upon to
preach to the Saints, which I endeavored to do, although I was scarcely
able to stand. I related many things respecting my mission and travels,
which were gladly received by the brethren, whose hearts were cheered
by the recital, while many of the Elders were stirred up to diligence,
and expressed a great desire to accompany us when we should return to
England.

Soon after my arrival, I had a lot given me by Bishop Partridge, and
also sufficient timber to build me a house. While it was being erected,
I lived in a place I built for my cow, about eleven feet square, and in
which I could hardly stand upright. The brethren were remarkably kind
and contributed to my necessities. One of them by the name of Charles
Hubbard, made me a present of forty acres of land, another gave me a
cow, etc.

When I had nearly finished my house, and after much labor, I was
obliged to abandon it to the mob, who at that time commenced
persecuting the Saints, driving off their cattle and destroying their
property.

It will not be expected that I should recapitulate the circumstances
which then transpired, which were of an extraordinary character, as
numbers have written on the subject. Suffice it to say, that the Saints
suffered privations, hunger, abuse, cold, famine, and many of them
death. Yes, the blood of the Saints has stained the soil of Missouri,
for which the King of kings and Lord of hosts will recompense upon her
the punishment of her crimes.

From about the 6th of August until the 1st of November it was a
continual scene of agitation and alarm, both by night and by day. The
enemies of righteousness were determined to overthrow the Saints,
and, regardless of all laws (which were trampled upon with impunity),
they made every preparation, and used every means in their power to
accomplish their unhallowed designs.

The Saints, tenacious of their liberties and sacred rights, resisted
these unlawful designs, and with courage worthy of them, they guarded
their families and their homes from the aggressions of the mob, but not
without the loss of several lives, among whom was my greatly esteemed
and much lamented friend, Elder David W. Patten, who fell a sacrifice
to the fell spirit of persecution, and a martyr to the cause of truth.
The circumstances of his death I will briefly relate:

It being ascertained that a mob had collected on Crooked River, in the
County of Caldwell, a company of sixty or seventy persons immediately
volunteered from Far West to watch their movements and repel their
attacks, and chose Elder Patten for their commander. They commenced
their march about midnight and came up to the mob very early next
morning, and as soon as the brethren approached near to them, they were
fired upon, when Captain Patten received a shot which proved fatal. The
mob after firing ran away. Several others of the brethren were wounded
at the same time, some of whom afterwards died.

Immediately on receiving the intelligence that Brother Patten was
wounded, I hastened to see him. When I arrived he appeared to be in
great pain, but still was glad to see me. He was conveyed about four
miles to the house of Brother Winchester. During his removal his
sufferings were so excruciating, that he frequently desired us to lay
him down that he might die. But being desirous to get him out of the
reach of the mob and among friends, we prevailed upon him to let us
convey him there.

He lived about an hour after his arrival, and was perfectly sensible
and collected until he breathed his last. He had medical assistance,
yet his wound was such that there was no hope entertained of his
recovery. This he was perfectly aware of. In this situation, while the
shades of time were lowering and eternity with all its realities was
opening to his view, he bore a strong testimony to the truth of the
work of the Lord and the religion he had espoused.

The principles of the gospel which were so precious to him before, were
honorably maintained in nature's final hour, and afforded him that
support and consolation at the time of his departure which deprived
death of its sting and its horror.

Speaking of those who had fallen from their steadfastness, he
exclaimed, "O that they were in my situation; for I feel that I have
kept the faith; I have finished my course; henceforth there is laid up
for me a crown which the Lord, the righteous Judge, shall give to me,"
etc.

Speaking to his beloved partner, who was present, and who attended
him in his dying moments, he said, "Whatever you do else, O, do not
deny the faith!" He all the while expressed a great desire to depart.
I spoke to him and said, "Brother David, when you get home I want you
to remember me." He immediately exclaimed, "I will." At this time his
sight was gone.

We felt so very much attached to our beloved brother, that we beseeched
the Lord to spare his life and endeavored to exercise faith in the Lord
for his recovery. Of this he was perfectly aware, and expressed a wish
that we should let him go, as his desire was to be with Christ.

A few minutes before he died he prayed as follows: "Father, I ask thee,
in the name of Jesus Christ, that thou wouldst release my spirit and
receive it unto Thyself!" and then said to those who surrounded his
dying bed, "Brethren, you have held me by your faith, but do give me
up, and let me go, I beseech you."

We then committed him to God, and he soon breathed his last, and slept
in Jesus without a groan.

This was the end of one who was an honor to the Church and a blessing
to the Saints, and whose faith and virtues and diligence in the cause
of truth will be long remembered by all who had the pleasure of his
acquaintance; and his memory will be had in remembrance by the Church
of Christ from generation to generation.

It was indeed a painful circumstance to be deprived of the labors of
this worthy servant of Christ, and it east a gloom over the Saints;
yet the glorious and sealing testimony which he bore of his acceptance
with heaven, and the truth of the gospel, was a matter of joy and
satisfaction, not only to his immediate friends, but to the Saints at
large.

I remained in the State of Missouri until the 26th of April, A. D.
1839, it being the time appointed by revelation for the Twelve to take
their leave of the building spot of the house of the Lord and take
their journey across the ocean, and notwithstanding the threats of our
enemies that this prophecy should fail, we assembled on the public
square, at Far West, assisted Elder Alpheus Cutler to lay the corner
foundation stone, sang a hymn and united in prayer to God that He would
give us a prosperous mission.

During my stay in Missouri, I frequently went to see the brethren who
were confined in prison for the testimony of Jesus and for the word of
God. Many times after I had traveled forty or fifty miles to see them,
I was denied the privilege by the jailor and the guards.

I was with the brethren in nearly all their movements in the west,
and can bear testimony to their faith and virtues, and know they were
entirely innocent of the crimes alleged against them, and that their
persecutions were brought upon them on account of their attachment to
the gospel and to the Saints of the Lord.

Although they were in the Lands of their enemies, who threatened to
kill them, I always had the testimony that they would be delivered and
come forth victorious.

After the 26th of April, A. D. 1839, I took leave of Far West, and in
company with my brethren traveled to Illinois, where my family had
removed some time previous, and I had the unspeakable pleasure of
seeing my beloved friends, the First Presidency and others who had been
delivered out of the hands of their enemies and had arrived safely in
Illinois.

Soon after a general conference of the Church was held near Quincy, at
which the Saints from all the regions round about assembled. It was a
time which will long be remembered by the Saints, it being the first
conference held after their expulsion.



CHAPTER XI.

FAR WEST BESIEGED--JOSEPH SMITH AND BRETHREN BETRAYED BY
APOSTATES--ATROCITIES OF MOB--CONVERSATION WITH W. E.
M'LELLIN--EXTERMINATION SPEECH OF GENERAL CLARK.

Before I proceed farther with my narrative, it may perhaps be as well
to revert to some other things that transpired in Missouri:

After witnessing the death of D. W. Patten, I took Dr. Avard with
me to Far West, a distance of three miles, to Elder Rigdon's house,
where we found Brother Patrick O'Banion, who was shot in nearly the
same place as Brother Patten (he was a member of Zion's Camp in 1834).
He also died in a short time, firm and steadfast in the faith, was
perfectly calm and composed, and bore a strong testimony to the truth
of "Mormonism."

Gideon Carter, who was also a faithful Saint, was shot in the head and
left dead on the ground, so defaced that the brethren did not at first
know him.

This was a gloomy time!

On the 30th of October, 1838, we discovered several thousand of the mob
coming to Far West, under pretense of being government troops. They
passed through our corn and wheat fields, making a complete desolation
of every thing in their way.

Brother Brigham Young and I were appointed captains of fifty, in a
hurry, and commanded to take our position right in the thoroughfare on
which the mob were seen advancing to the city, momentarily anticipating
the awful tragedy of a bloody massacre. Joseph was with us, giving
counsel.

The army came up to good rifle shot distance and halted. Seeing our
temporary fortifications, which we had thrown up the night previous,
by pulling down some of our houses, and fixing up our wagon, they
dared not approach nearer, but retreated back to Goose Creek, about
three-fourths of a mile, screaming, hallooing and screeching. The mob
afterwards declared there were fifteen hundred of us stationed there
to prevent their approach, but to my certain knowledge there were only
about one hundred and fifty in that line.

The word came that Joseph Smith and several others were to be given up;
otherwise the mob would massacre every man, woman and child.

In order to prevent the execution of this threat, Joseph gave himself
up, with Elders Sidney Rigdon, P. P. Pratt, Lyman Wight and George W.
Robinson, they having been betrayed into the camp by Col. George M.
Hinkle and other apostates.

On the 1st of November, the mob, professing to be the regular militia
of the State of Missouri, numbering about seven thousand, surrounded
Far West. Our men were all taken prisoners and then marched a short
distance into a hollow, where Col. Lucas had previously pointed his
cannon in full range, so that if we failed to lay down our arms, he
could easily sweep us into eternity, which was his design. We were then
formed into a hollow square and commanded by Col. Lucas to ground arms
and deliver up our weapons of war, although they were our own private
property. After being marched back a short distance, on the public
square, we were again formed into a hollow square, near the house of
Widow Beeman.

The mob commenced plundering the citizens of their bedding, money,
wearing apparel and everything of value they could lay their hands
upon. Much property was destroyed by the burning of houses, logs,
rails, corn cribs, boards, etc., the using of corn and hay, the killing
of cattle, sheep and hogs, etc., and all this without regard to owners,
or asking leave of any one. In the meantime, men were abused, and women
insulted, and treated with violence by the troops, while the men were
kept prisoners.

We were compelled at the point of the bayonet to sign a deed of trust
for the purpose of making our individual property liable, as they said,
to pay all the debts of persons belonging to the Church, and also for
all damages the old inhabitants of Daviess County might have sustained
in consequence of the late difficulties in that County.

When General Clark arrived, the first important move made by him, was
collecting our men together on the square, and selecting about fifty of
them, whom he immediately marched into a house and confined closely.
This was done without the aid of the sheriff or any legal process.

The next day, forty-six of those taken, with the Prophet Joseph, were
driven, like a parcel of menial slaves, off to Richmond, not knowing
why they were taken.

When these troops surrounded us, and we were brought into a hollow
square, the first persons that I knew, were men who had once professed
to be our brethren. They were the men who piloted the mob into our
city, namely: William E. McLellin and Lyman E. Johnson, two of the
Twelve; John Whitmer and David Whitmer, two of the witnesses to the
Book of Mormon; William W. Phelps, and scores of others, "hail fellows,
well met."

A portion of the troops were painted like Indians, and looked horrible.
They were led by Niel Gillum, who styled himself "the Delaware chief,"
who, with many others, cocked his gun upon us and swore he would blow
our brains out, although we were disarmed and helpless.

William E. McLellin inquired where Heber C. Kimball was, and some one
pointed me out to him. I was sitting on the ground. When he came up
to me, he said, "Brother Heber, what do you think of Joseph Smith,
the fallen prophet, now? Has he not led you blindfolded long enough?
Look and see yourself poor, your family stripped and robbed, and your
brethren in the same fix. Are you not satisfied with Joseph?"

I replied, "Yes, I am more satisfied a hundred fold than I was before;
for I see you in the very position that he foretold you would be in--a
Judas to betray your brethren, if you did not forsake your adultery,
fornication, lying and abominations. Where are you? What are you
about--you, and Hinkle, and scores of others? Have you not betrayed
Joseph and his brethren into the hands of the mob, as Judas did Jesus?
Yes, verily, you have! I tell you 'Mormonism' is true, and Joseph is
a true Prophet of the living God, and you with all others that turn
therefrom will be damned and go to hell, and Judas will rule over you!"

Soon after this, when things began to be a little more quiet, I desired
to go to my home to get something to eat, many of us not having eaten
any food for twenty-four hours. I asked some of the mob standing near
if I could have the privilege of going to my house, a little distance
off. They referred me to their captain, who was Bogart, the Methodist
preacher. I went to him and told him what I wanted. He first spoke of
sending some one with me, as I would be liable to be shot if found
alone. In a short time, however, he said, "I will go with you."

He went down to my house, and my wife got some dinner and he ate with
me; then we returned, and I again took my seat on the ground with my
brethren who were under guard.

The next day I was permitted to return to my home, but told that I need
not try to leave the city as it was surrounded with a strong guard to
prohibit any one leaving the place. The mob were engaged taking every
man a prisoner who seemed to have any influence, and putting him in
chains to await a trial.

It was rumored that all the men who were in the Crooked River battle
would be taken prisoners; therefore, many of them fled to the north
before the guards were placed around the city.

The 6th of November, General Clark delivered his noted extermination
speech, and read over the names of fifty-six brethren who were made
prisoners, to await a trial for something they knew not what.

In order that the tyrant may not be forgotten, I insert a portion of
his speech:

"GENTLEMEN:--You whose names are not attached to this list of names,
will now have the privilege of going to your fields, and of providing
corn, wood, etc., for your families. Those who are now taken will go
from this to prison, be tried and receive the due demerit of their
crimes; but you, (except such as charges may hereafter be preferred
against,) are at liberty, as soon as the troops are removed that now
guard the place, which I shall cause to be done immediately. It now
devolves upon you to fulfil a treaty that you have entered into, the
leading items of which I shall now lay before you. The first requires
that your leading men be given up to be tried according to law; this
you already have complied with. The second is, that you deliver up your
arms; this has been attended to. The third stipulation is that you sign
over your properties to defray the expenses of the war. This you have
also done. Another article yet remains for you to comply with--and
that is, that you leave the State forth with. And whatever may be your
feelings concerning this, or whatever your innocence, it is nothing to
me. General Lucas (whose military rank is equal with mine,) has made
this treaty with you; I approve of it. I should have done the same
had I been here. I am therefore determined to see it executed. The
character of this State has suffered almost beyond redemption, from the
character, conduct and influence that you have exerted; and we deem
it an act of justice to restore her character to its former standing
among the States by every proper means. The orders of the governor to
me were, _that you should be exterminated, and not allowed to remain in
the State_. And had not your leaders been given up, and the terms of
the treaty complied with, before this time you and your families would
have been destroyed, and your houses in ashes. There is a discretionary
power vested in my hands, which, considering your circumstances, I
shall exercise for a season. You are indebted to me for this clemency.
I do not say that you shall go now, but you must not think of staying
here another season or of putting in crops; for the moment you do this
the citizens will be upon you; and if I am called here again in case
of non-compliance of a treaty made, do not think that I shall do as
I have done now. You need not expect any mercy, but _extermination,
for I am determined the governor's order shall be executed_. As for
your leaders, do not think, do not imagine for a moment, do not let
it enter into your minds, that they will be delivered and restored to
you again, for _their fate is fixed, their die is cast, their doom is
sealed_. I am sorry, gentlemen, to see so many apparently intelligent
men found in the situation that you are; and oh! if I could invoke
that Great Spirit, THE UNKNOWN GOD, to rest upon and deliver you
from that awful chain of superstition, and liberate you from those
fetters of fanaticism with which you are bound--that you no longer do
homage to a man. I would advise you to scatter abroad, and never again
organize yourselves with Bishops, Presidents, etc., lest you excite the
jealousies of the people and subject yourselves to the same calamities
that have now come upon you. You have always been the aggressors--you
have brought upon yourselves these difficulties, by being disaffected,
and not being subject to rule. And my advice is, that you become as
other citizens, least by a recurrence of these events you bring upon
yourselves irretrievable ruin."

He also said, "You must not be seen as many as five together; if you
are, the citizens will be upon you and destroy you, but you should flee
immediately out of the State. There is no alternative for you but to
flee; you need not expect any redress; there is none for you."

I was present when that speech was delivered, and I can truly say that
he is a liar and the truth is not in him, for not one of us had made
any such agreement with Lucas, or any other person. What we did was by
compulsion in every sense of the word; and as for General Clark and his
unknown god, they had nothing to do with our deliverance; but it was
our Father in heaven, the God of Abraham, of Isaac and of Jacob, in
whom we trust, who liveth and dwelleth in the heavens; and the day will
come when our God will hold him in derision, with all of his coadjutors.



CHAPTER XII.

PERILS OF THE PEOPLE--CHEERFULNESS OF THE SAINTS AMIDST THEIR
TROUBLES--VISIT OUR BRETHREN IN PRISON--APOSTLES ORDAINED--MOCK
DISTRIBUTION OF STATE APPROPRIATION--LETTER FROM JOSEPH SMITH
AND BRETHREN IN PRISON--INDIFFERENCE OF STATE OFFICIALS TO OUR
APPEALS--WORD OF THE LORD TO ME.

One afternoon, I sent my son William a short distance on an errand,
when, on his return, one of the guards drew up his rifle and threatened
to blow out his brains if he stepped one inch further towards the
house. Through the agency of some of my brethren, I was notified of it.
I went to the man and spoke to him in a friendly manner, and conversed
with him about the beautiful country, it being more beautiful than
England and the nations I had been traveling in.

He became very much interested, and in a short time I pointed out my
son William, who had stood still for some time after being warned not
to approach, and was cold, as it was then dusk and the weather severe.
Said I, "That is my son."

"Oh!" he said, "if that is one of your sons, he may pass; he may go
home."

Afterwards the man left his post and came to my house and spent the
evening and several times afterwards, and became very friendly, and
told me he wished I would leave the "Mormons," as he liked me, and
could not bear the thought of my following them with my family, for we
were too good for them.

I merely mention this to show the perils we were in, men, women and
children, with death and destruction waiting on us, and this spirit
aroused by apostates.

The murders, house burnings, robberies, rapes, drivings, whippings,
imprisonments, chainings and other sufferings and cruelties inflicted
upon the people of God under illegal orders of Missouri's executive,
have been only in part laid before the world, and form a page in
history unparalleled in the records of religious persecution. This
historic page alone can credit Lilburn W. Boggs and his minions with
feeding the ministers of the proscribed religion on the flesh of their
murdered brethren, the odium of which crime is shared fully by the
professed ministers of different denominations who participated in
these vile atrocities! If hell can furnish a parallel, where is it?

For me to undertake to write what I saw, and felt and realized, I
should utterly fail for lack of ability; I must let eternity reveal the
scenes of those days. I can say before God, angels, heaven and earth,
that I am innocent of violating any law of the State of Missouri, and
I can say that my brethren are as pure and clean as I am, innocent and
virtuous, true to their God and their country. With the measure they
meted to the Latter-day Saints, it shall be measured to them again, or
upon all those who had a hand in our persecution and expulsion, and
those who consented to it, four fold, full, pressed down, and running
over shall be their portion; and as the Lord God Almighty liveth, I
shall live to see it come to pass. [A]

[Footnote A: Elder Kimball lived to see the fulfillment of this
prophecy.]

When we walked up to sign the deeds of trust to pay these assassins for
murdering our brethren and sisters and their children, ravishing some
of our sisters to death, robbing us of our lands and possessions and
all we had on earth, and other such _services_, they expected to see
us cast down and sorrowful; but I testify as an eye-witness that the
brethren rejoiced and praised the Lord and kicked up their heels, and
thanked God, taking joyfully the despoiling of their goods. There were
judges, magistrates and Methodist, Presbyterian, Campbellite and other
sectarian priests who stood by and saw all this going on, exulting over
us, and it seemed to make them more angry that we bore our misfortunes
so cheerfully. Judge Cameron said, with an oath, "See them creatures
laugh and kick up their heels! They are whipped but not conquered."

I have no doubt that I would have been taken a prisoner had the mob
known me, but I had not been there but three weeks when the mobbing
commenced, and was only known by the brethren, and many of them I
had not seen during my brief residence there. The mob had not become
acquainted with Brother Brigham, either, as he lived three or four
miles from the city on Mill Creek.

After the mob departed, I accompanied Brother Brigham to Richmond
jail to see our brethren. We found Joseph, Hyrum, Sidney and others
chained together in one room, and others confined in other places among
the worst demons living out of hell. We scarcely had the privilege
of speaking to our brethren more than to say, "How do you do?" every
eye being upon us with suspicion. We put up at a public house for
the night, and I bear testimony, from our feelings and the spirit
manifested in that house, that there were legions of devils present. I
do not think that either of us slept any that night.

On the 13th of December, Elder Brigham Young and I reorganized the High
Council at Far West, when we expressed our fellowship with all those
who desired to do right, and filled the vacancies occasioned by those
brethren who had to flee from Missouri to save their lives.

On the 19th of December, 1838, Brother Brigham and I ordained Elders
John Taylor and John E. Page Apostles.

The legislature of the State of Missouri appropriated two thousand
dollars, to be distributed among the people of Daviess and Caldwell
Counties, the "Mormons" not excepted. Judge Cameron, Mr. McHenry and
others attended to the distribution. Judge Cameron drove in the hogs
belonging to the brethren (many of which were identified), shot them
down in the street, and without further bleeding, they were half
dressed, cut up and distributed by Mr. McHenry to the poor, at the rate
of four and five cents per pound, which, together with a few pieces
of refuse calicoes at double and treble prices, soon consumed the
appropriation.

I received the following letter from the Prophet and his brethren while
they were in prison.

"LIBERTY,

"Jan. 16th, 1839.

"BROTHERS H. C. KIMBALL AND B. YOUNG:

"_Joseph Smith, Jun., Sidney Rigdon and Hyrum Smith, prisoners for
Jesus' sake, send greeting_:--In obedience to your request in your
letter, we say to you as follows: It is not wisdom for you to go out
of Caldwell with your families yet for a little season; until we are
out of prison; after which you may act at your pleasure; but though you
take your families out of the State, it will be necessary for you to
return, and leave as before designed, on the 26th of April.

"Inasmuch as we are in prison, for a little season, if need be, the
management of the affairs of the Church devolves on you, that is the
Twelve.

"The gathering of necessity is stopped; but the conversion of the world
need not stop, but under wise management can go on more rapidly than
ever.

"Where churches are built, let them continue where they are, until
a door is open to do otherwise, and let every Elder occupy his own
ground, and when he builds a church, let him preside over it, and let
not others run in to trouble him; and thus let every man prove himself
unto God, that he is worthy. If we live, we live; and if we die for the
testimony of Jesus, we die; but whether we live or die, let the work of
God go on.

"Let the churches in England continue there till further orders--till a
door can be opened for them, except they choose to come to America, and
take their chance with the Saints here. If they will do that, let them
come; and if they choose to come, they would do well to send their wise
men before them, and buy out Kirtland, and the regions round about, or
they may settle where they can till things may alter.

"It will be necessary for you to get the Twelve together, ordain such
as have not been ordained, or at least such of them as you can get,
and proceed to regulate the Elders as the Lord may give you wisdom. We
nominate George A. Smith and Lyman Sherman to take the places of Orson
Hyde and Thomas B. Marsh.

"Brethren, fear not, but be strong in the Lord and in the power of His
might. What is man that the servant of God should fear him, or the
son of man, that he should tremble at him. Neither think it strange
concerning the fiery trials with which we are tried, as though some
strange thing had happened unto us. Remember that all have been
partakers of like afflictions. Therefore, rejoice in our afflictions,
by which you are perfected and through which the Captain of our
Salvation was perfected also. Let your hearts and the hearts of all
the Saints be comforted with you, and let them rejoice exceedingly,
for great is our reward in heaven, for so the wicked persecuted the
prophets which were before us. America will be a Zion to all that
choose to come to it; and if the churches in foreign countries wish
to come, let them do so. Say to brother P. P. Pratt that our feelings
accord with his; he is as we are, and we as he. May peace rest upon him
in life and in death.

"Brethren, pray for us, and cease not till our deliverance comes, which
we hope may come. We _hope_, we say, for our families' sake.

"Let the Elders preach nothing but the first principles of the gospel,
and let them publish our afflictions--the injustice and cruelty
thereof, upon the house tops. Let them write it and publish it in all
the papers where they go. Charge them particularly on this point.

"Brethren we remain yours in hope of eternal life,

"SIDNEY RIGDON.

"JOSEPH SMITH JR.

"HYRUM SMITH.

"N. B. Appoint the oldest of those of the Twelve, who were first
appointed, to be the president of your quorum.

"J. S.

"S. R.

"H. S."

On the 7th of February, 1839, I accompanied Brother Brigham to Liberty,
to visit Joseph and the brethren in prison. We had the privilege of
going in to see and converse with them. We stayed at Liberty over
night, and the next morning we were permitted to visit the prisoners
again, while they were at breakfast. We returned during the day to Far
West.

When we left there, Lyman Sherman was somewhat unwell, and in a few
days after our return he died. We did not notify him of his appointment.

I fitted up a small wagon, procured a span of ponies, and sent my wife
and three children out of the State in company with Brother Brigham
Young and his family, and several others, who left Far West February
14th. Everything my family took with them out of Missouri, could have
been packed on the backs of two horses; the mob took all the rest.

Being a stranger in Missouri, I was requested by Joseph, Brigham and
others to tarry and assist the committee in getting the brethren and
families out of the State, and in waiting upon those brethren who were
confined in prison.

On the 12th of March, I wrote to Joseph Fielding, Liverpool, England,
saying: "I have only received two letters from you since I have come
here. If you knew the feelings I have for the welfare of that people,
your pen would not be so idle. May God stir you up to diligence to
feed the sheep of God; for they are children of my begetting through
the gospel. Think it not strange that I speak thus; for you know the
feelings that a father has for his children.

"Now, brethren, be faithful and visit the churches, and exhort the
Saints to be faithful in all things, and not lay down their watch for
a moment; for there is great danger of falling beneath the powers of
darkness. Don't think hard of me, brethren, for my plainness, for I
am a plain man, and God requires it of me, and the same of you. Don't
keep the Saints in ignorance of those things I have made you acquainted
with--that is, our sufferings, for they will know them when I come, and
they will have to pass through similar scenes. Don't be selfish; for it
will not impoverish you to tell them all that I tell you.

"Your sister Mary left here about eight weeks ago, also the rest of the
wives of the prisoners, thinking that they would be out in a few days.
There are ten in prison; they are all well and in good spirits. I am
going to see them to-morrow if the Lord will.

"Mobs are common in this country; it is getting so that there is no
safety anywhere in this land. Prepare yourselves for trouble wherever
you go, for it awaits you and all others that love the Lord and keep
His commandments.

"Brethren, I want you to go to the north where Brother Russell labored,
and see what situation the Saints are in, for I have some fears about
them. Go and strengthen them in the name of the Lord. * * * * * *

"Brethren, I can truly say that I have never seen the Church in a
better state since I have been a member of it. What there are left are
firm and steadfast, full of love and good works. They have lost all
their earthly goods, and are now ready to go and preach the gospel
to a dying world. We have ordained about one hundred Elders into the
Seventies. There are about one hundred and fifty who have gone into the
vineyard this winter to preach the gospel, and many more will go in the
spring, and several will come to England with me in the summer or fall.
Elder Rigdon was bailed out of prison, and has left Missouri. About ten
thousand had gathered to this State. By the 1st of May next there will
not be one left who has any faith. Not one-fourth part had any teams to
move with, and we had two hundred miles to travel before we could get
out of the State. I think their deliverance is a great miracle."

About this time, Orson Hyde came to me, feeling very sorrowful for the
course he had pursued the past few months. He said it was because of
fear, and that he lamented his folly, and he asked me what he should
do. I told him to give up his school, remove his family and gather with
the Church. He wanted to know if I thought the brethren would forgive
him. I said, "Yes."

He then asked, "Will you defend my case?" and I promised him I would.

On the 15th, the Prophet Joseph and others petitioned Judge Tompkins,
or either of the supreme judges of the State of Missouri, for a States
writ of _habeas corpus_, that he and his brethren might be brought
before either of those judges, that justice might be administered. I
was requested by Joseph to go to Jefferson and present the petition.

Theodore Turley accompanied me. We took copies of the papers by which
the prisoners were held, with the petition to the supreme judges, and
immediately started a distance of three hundred miles. We visited the
judges, and laid the whole matter before them individually, according
to our best ability. Neither of them would take any action in the
case, although they appeared friendly and acknowledged that they were
illegally imprisoned. We also presented a petition to the secretary of
state, the governor being absent. He appeared very kind, but like the
other officers, he _had no power to do good_.

We immediately returned to Liberty, where we arrived on the 3rd,
and made Joseph and the prisoners acquainted with the result of our
mission--through the gate of the dungeon, as we were not permitted to
enter the prison.

Joseph told us to be of good cheer, for the Lord would deliver him and
his brethren in due time. He also told us to advise the brethren to
keep up their spirits, and get all the Saints away as fast as possible.

In company with Brother Turley, I visited Judge Austin A. King, who was
vexed at us for presenting his illegal papers to the supreme judges. He
treated us very roughly.

I returned to Far West April 5th, and remained a few days. My family
having been gone about two months (during which time I heard nothing
from them), our brethren being in prison, and death and destruction
following us wherever we went, I felt very sorrowful and lonely. While
in this condition, the following words came to my mind, and the Spirit
said unto me, "write." I obeyed by taking a piece of paper and writing
on my knee, as follows:

"FAR WEST,

"April 6, 1839.

"_A Word from the Spirit of the Lord to My Servant Heber C. Kimball_:

"Verily, I say unto my servant Heber, thou art my son in whom I am
well pleased; for thou art careful to hearken to my words, and not
transgress my law nor rebel against my servant Joseph Smith; for thou
hast a respect to the words of mine anointed, even from the least to
the greatest of them; therefore, thy name is written in heaven, no more
to be blotted out forever, because of these things; and this spirit and
blessing shall rest down upon thy posterity forever and ever; for they
shall be called after thy name, for thou shalt have many more sons and
daughters, for thy seed shall be as numerous as the sands upon the sea
shore. Therefore, my servant Heber, be faithful; go forth in my name
and I will go with you, and be on your right hand and on your left,
and my angels shall go before you and raise you up when you are cast
down and afflicted. Remember that I am always with you, even to the
end; therefore, be of good cheer, my son, and my Spirit shall be in
your heart, to teach you the peaceable things of the kingdom. Trouble
not thyself about thy family, for they are in my hands; I will feed
them and clothe them and make unto them friends. They never shall want
for food nor raiment, houses nor lands, fathers nor mothers, brothers
nor sisters; and peace shall rest upon them forever, if thou wilt be
faithful and go forth and preach my gospel to the nations of the earth;
for thou shalt be blessed in this thing. Thy tongue shall be loosed
to such a degree that has not entered into thy heart as yet, and the
children of men shall believe thy words, and flock to the water, even
as they did to my servant John; for thou shalt be great in winning
souls to me, for this is thy gift and calling. And there shall be no
gift withheld from thee, if thou art faithful; therefore, be faithful,
and I will give thee favor in the eyes of the people. Be humble and
kind, and thou shalt obtain kindness; be merciful, and thou shalt
obtain mercy; and I will be with thee even unto the end. Amen."



CHAPTER XIII.

FINAL EXPULSION FROM FAR WEST--DESTRUCTION OF PROPERTY--ESCAPE OF
JOSEPH SMITH AND BRETHREN--ATTEMPT TO VISIT PARLEY P. PRATT AND
BRETHREN IN PRISON--FORCED TO FLEE TO ESCAPE MOB VIOLENCE--ASSEMBLY OF
APOSTLES AND OTHERS ON TEMPLE SITE ACCORDING TO REVELATION--ARRIVAL IN
ILLINOIS--WORD OF THE LORD FULFILLED.

Judge King having ordered the removal of the prisoners from Liberty to
Daviess County, fearing that we might get a change of venue to some
other place, Brother Daniel Shearer and I were appointed to visit
Judge Hughes, who had formerly been an Indian agent, and get him to
go to Daviess and attend the sitting of the court there. He expressed
himself in friendly terms towards Joseph and the brethren. Being a very
rough man in his language, he cursed the judges and the governor and
everybody else that would not step forward and help our friends out
of the hands of their persecutors, for he did not believe they were
guilty of any of the crimes alleged against them. Said he, "There is no
proof that these men have committed any crime worthy of imprisonment or
death, and the Mormons have been treated mean." Looking us directly in
the eye, he said, with an oath, "Look at their eyes; see how bright and
keen they are! They are whipped but not conquered; you can see that in
their eyes."

There were several men in Liberty who were very friendly to the
brethren. I called on them when I went there and they treated me with
great civility. Among these were General Doniphan and Atchison and the
keeper of the tavern where I put up at, and several of the foremost men
who belonged to the masonic fraternity.

Those men whom I have named, and several others, revolted at the
scenes enacted against the "Mormons," and would have liberated the
brethren, had it not been for the "outside pressure," that is, the
strong prejudices imbibed by the people generally against us, and their
blood-thirsty desire to kill the Prophets.

I sent one hundred dollars by Brother Stephen Markham to Joseph, and
also various sums at different times by other individuals.

The mob continued to threaten the few Saints who remained in Far West,
and accordingly on the 14th of April, 1838, the committee, who had been
left there to look after the wants of the poor, removed thirty-six of
the helpless families into Tenney's grove, about twenty-five miles from
Far West. I was obliged to secrete myself in the corn-fields and woods
during the day and only venture out in the evening, to counsel the
committee and brethren in private houses.

On the morning of the 18th, as I was going to the committee room to
tell the brethren to wind up their affairs and be off, or their lives
would be taken, I was met on the public square by several of the mob.
One of them asked, with an oath, if I was a "Mormon."

I replied, "I am a 'Mormon.'"

With a series of blasphemous expressions, they then threatened to blow
my brains out, and also tried to ride over me with their horses, in the
presence of Elias Smith, Theodore Turley and others of the committee.

It was but a few minutes after I had notified the committee to leave
before the mob gathered at the tithing house, and began breaking
clocks, chairs, windows, looking-glasses and furniture, and making a
complete wreck of everything they could move, while Captain Bogart, the
County judge, looked on and laughed. A mobber named Whittaker threw an
iron pot at the head of Theodore Turley and hurt him considerably, when
Whittaker jumped about and laughed like a mad man; and all this at the
time when we were using our utmost endeavors to get the Saints away
from Far West. The brethren gathered up what they could, and fled from
Far West in one hour. The mob staid until the committee left, and then
plundered thousands of dollars worth of property which had been left by
the brethren and sisters to assist the poor to remove.

One mobber rode up, and, finding no convenient place to fasten his
horse to, shot a cow that was standing near, while a girl was milking
her, and while the poor animal was struggling in death, he cut a strip
of her hide from the nose to her tail, to which he fastened his halter.

During the commotion of this day, a great portion of the records of the
committee, accounts, history, etc., were destroyed or stolen.

Hearing that Joseph and his brethren had escaped from their guard while
they were on their way from Daviess to Boone County, to which place
they had obtained a change of venue, I called on Shadrach Roundy, with
whom I started immediately towards Quincy, Illinois.

On reaching Keetsville I stopped at the house of Colonel Price. The
Colonel hearing of my arrival, came directly into the house, and,
discovering who I was, said, "Joseph and Hyrum Smith and the other
prisoners have escaped."

I enquired what he knew about them, and he answered, "Their guard took
breakfast here this morning. They have turned back, saying they were
going back to Richmond, by way of Tenney's grove. I know that the
guards have been bribed, or they would evince more interest in pursuing
them."

After we had partaken of refreshments, Brother Roundy and I pursued
our course towards Quincy about fourteen or fifteen miles, when, being
thoroughly satisfied that the prisoners had escaped, we turned back
towards Far West.

When we arrived at Tenney's grove, a man came to me and presented an
order drawn on me, by Joseph Smith, for five hundred dollars, saying it
was for horses furnished him. I immediately raised four hundred dollars
and paid him, when he proceeded to Richmond, Ray County, where he paid
out the money to secure some of the lands that we had been driven from.

Brother Roundy and I started a few hours afterwards for Richmond, being
on our way to Far West, for the purpose of visiting Parley P. Pratt and
others in jail.

On our arrival at Richmond, I went directly to the prison to see
Parley, but was prohibited by the guard, who said they would blow my
brains out if I attempted to go near him. In a few minutes, Sister
Morris Phelps came to me in great agitation and advised me to leave
forthwith, as Brother Pratt had told her that a large body of men had
assembled with tar, feathers and a rail, who swore they would tar and
feather me, and ride me on the rail. They suspected I was the one who
had assisted Joseph and the other prisoners to escape.

I immediately informed Brother Roundy, and we jumped on our horses and
fled towards Far West, which was forty miles distant. We rode all night
and reached Far West about the break of day. Expecting Brother Brigham
Young and the Twelve to arrive there that day, I kept myself concealed
in the woods, and passed around the country notifying the brethren and
sisters to be on hand at the appointed time to witness the work upon
the temple.

On the night of April 25th, which was pleasant, clear and moonlight,
Elders Brigham Young, Orson Pratt, John E. Page, John Taylor, Wilford
Woodruff, George A. Smith and Alphens Cutler arrived from Quincy,
Illinois, and rode into the public square early on the morning of the
26th. All seemed still as death.

We held a conference at the house of Brother Samuel Clark, cut off
thirty-one persons from the Church, and then proceeded to the building
spot of the Lord's house, where, after singing a hymn on the mission
of the Twelve, we recommenced laying the foundation, agreeable to the
revelation given July 8th, 1838, by rolling a stone, upwards of a ton
in weight, upon or near the south-east corner.

We ordained Wilford Woodruff and George A. Smith, who had been
previously nominated by the First Presidency, accepted by the Twelve,
and acknowledged by the Church at Quincy, members of the quorum of
the Twelve Apostles. We ordained as Seventies, Darwin Chase and
Norman Shearer, who had been liberated from Richmond prison two days
previously, where they had been confined about six months for the cause
of Christ.

The Twelve then, individually called upon the Lord in prayer in the
following order: Brigham Young, Heber C. Kimball, Orson Pratt, John
E. Page, John Taylor, Wilford Woodruff and George A. Smith, kneeling
on the corner stone; after which "Adam-ondi-Ahman" was sung, when the
Twelve took leave of the Saints, agreeable to the revelation.

The brethren wandered among our deserted houses, many of which were in
ruins, and saw the streets in many places grown over with grass.

We went to Father Clark's, got breakfast, and before sunrise we
departed. We rode thirty miles that day, and camped at night with the
families of Elders Clark and Turley.

On arriving at Quincy on the 2nd of May, I found my family well and
in good spirits; and on reading the words of inspiration which I had
written, my wife bore record to the truth of that part which says,
"Trouble not thyself about thy family, for they are in my hands. I
will feed them and clothe them and make unto them friends," etc. I
learned from her that my family continued with Brother Brigham until
they crossed the Mississippi to the town of Atlas, in Illinois, where,
through the instrumentality of George Pitkin, my wife got introduced to
a Widow Ross, who let her have a comfortably-fitted-up room, and the
privilege of cooking by her fire, and who was as kind to her as an own
mother or sister. Here my wife tarried seven weeks, and only had to pay
fifty cents a week. At the end of that time, John P. Greene came with
his wagon and horses and carried my family up to Quincy, forty miles,
and rented a good room where I found her.

She had had no lack of friends and had every comfort bestowed upon
her that she could have had among her own kindred; and I can say in
my heart, God bless all who aided and assisted my family. Jesus says
every man shall be rewarded for every good deed that he doeth and even
if a man giveth a cup of cold water to a disciple he shall receive a
disciple's reward.

In relation to that part of the Lord's word to me which said I should
have many sons and daughters, my wife was rather in doubt, as she
considered she was too advanced in years, and the thought had never
entered our minds that the Lord would establish in this Church the
doctrine of plurality of wives in my day; still I believed it would be
restored to the earth in some future time.



CHAPTER XIV.

JOYFUL MEETING WITH JOSEPH--FIRST CONFERENCE IN ILLINOIS--FIRST VISIT
TO COMMERCE--MY IMPRESSION CONCERNING THE NEW GATHERING PLACE--MY
RECOMMEND--STRUGGLE WITH EVIL SPIRITS--JOSEPH SMITH'S EXPERIENCE
WITH EVIL SPIRITS--P. P. PRATT'S ESCAPE FROM PRISON--BUILDING
HOUSES--PROSTRATED WITH SICKNESS--REMARKABLE MANIFESTATION OF THE GIFT
OF HEALING.

On the 3rd of May, 1839, in company with Elders Brigham Young, O.
Pratt, John Taylor, W. Woodruff and George A. Smith, I rode four miles
to Mr. Cleaveland's, to visit Joseph and Hyrum, who were as glad to see
us as we were to see them once more enjoying their liberty. I spent the
day with them and it was one of the greatest days of rejoicing in my
life to once more have the privilege of conversing with the Prophet in
freedom.

The next day I attended a general conference of the Church near Quincy,
at which the Saints from all the regions round about assembled. It was
a time which will long be remembered by the Saints, being the first
conference held after their expulsion.

The cases of Brothers William Smith and Orson Hyde were brought up. I
had previously informed Brother Hyrum Smith of Orson Hyde's feelings
of repentance, and desire to return to the Church. Hyrum partook of
the spirit, and when Joseph presented the name of Orson Hyde before
the Church, Hyrum and I plead for him according to the spirit that was
in us. Joseph then remarked, "If my brother Hyrum and Heber C. Kimball
will defend Orson Hyde, I will withdraw my motion."

The conference granted them the privilege of appearing personally
before the next conference of the Church, to give an account of their
conduct, but required that in the meantime they both be suspended from
executing the functions of their office.

The conference sanctioned the proceeding of the Twelve on the temple
block at Far West, on the 26th of April, and also the intended mission
of the Twelve to Europe.

The conference continued for three days, and a most agreeable time was
enjoyed. Elder Rigdon was appointed delegate to go to Washington and
lay the grievances of the Saints before the general government, and it
was also resolved that a number of Elders should accompany the Twelve
on their mission to Europe.

On Sunday, the 12th of May, I went up to Commerce, in company with some
of the Twelve, in a wagon.

On the 25th I crossed the river with several of my brethren and
spent the day in council with Joseph and others. While crossing the
Mississippi, I was standing by the railing of the boat, looking at the
beautiful site of Nauvoo, and remarked, "It is a very pretty place, but
not a long abiding place for the Saints."

These remarks reached the ears of Elder Rigdon and family, and caused
them to feel somewhat sad, as they were well situated in a nice stone
house. When we met in council, in the house of Joseph Smith, Elder
Rigdon said he had some feelings toward Elder Kimball, and added, "I
should suppose that Elder Kimball had passed through sufferings and
privations and mobbings and drivings enough to learn to prophesy good
concerning Israel."

I saw that I was likely to receive quite a chastisement from Elder
Rigdon, and knowing his peculiar temperament, I arose and said,
"President Rigdon, I'll prophesy good concerning you all the time if
you can get it!"

On hearing that, Joseph had a hearty laugh with the brethren, and Elder
Rigdon yielded the point.

I here insert a recommend from the Presidency:

"_To the Saints Scattered Abroad, to the Nations of Europe and to the
World_:

"Be it known unto you that Heber C. Kimball is fully authorized to
preach the gospel of Jesus Christ, and his testimony can be relied on.
He is a man of unexceptionable character, and received his authority
and Priesthood from under the hands of the presiding authorities of the
Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, who were called by actual
revelation from God. Therefore, God will bless him, and bear record by
His power, thereby confirming his word and ministry. Thus testifieth
your humble servants,

"SIDNEY RIGDON,

"HYRUM SMITH,

"JOSEPH SMITH, JR.

"QUINCY, ILL., June 3, 1839."

I wrote to P. P. Pratt, giving him the particulars of our conference
at Far West on the 26th of April, and the resolution that the Twelve
should have their shackles taken off, that they might go forth into
the world to preach the gospel, and that the Bishops were to provide
for our families, etc. I also added, "The Presidency feel well towards
you. They say you must come out of that place, and so I say; for I do
not feel as though I can go to England until I take you by the hand.
When this takes place my joy will be full. Be of good cheer, brother; a
few days now, and you shall see the salvation of God; and I shall see
you in other lands, publishing peace to the captives. My determination
is to be a man of God, and to try to save souls from their sins, let
others do as they may. I will try to keep my eye on the mark, that is,
Christ, the Son of the living God, His grace assisting me. The Twelve
have all left Quincy. Orson is about twenty-five miles from here.
Whatever you do, do quickly!"

Joseph advised those of the Twelve whose families were not at Commerce
to remove them immediately to the new gathering place. I accordingly
went to Quincy and removed my family up to a place belonging to Brother
Bozier, about one mile from Commerce, where I pulled down an old stable
and laid up the logs at the back end of the Bozier house, putting a
few shakes on to cover it; but it had no floor or chinking. In this
condition I moved my family into it. Whenever it rained the water
stood nearly ankle deep on the ground in the house. There were some
half-a-dozen families in the Bozier house.

The 25th, 26th and 27th of June I spent in council with the Presidency
and Twelve, and received much valuable instruction from the Prophet. At
this conference Orson Hyde appeared, made a humble confession, and was
restored to the Priesthood.

One night I was awakened out of my sleep by my wife making a noise as
though she was nearly choking to death. I inquired the cause, and she
replied that she had dreamed that a personage came and seized her by
the throat and was choking her. I immediately lit a candle and saw that
her eyes were sunken and her nose pinched in as though she was in the
last stage of the cholera. I laid hands upon her and rebuked the evil
spirit in the name of Jesus, and by the power of the holy Priesthood
commanded it to depart. In a moment afterwards I heard some half a
dozen children in different parts of the Bozier house crying as if in
great distress. The cattle also began to bellow, the horses neighed,
the dogs barked, the hogs squealed, the hens cackled and roosters
crowed, and everything around seemed in great commotion. In a few
minutes afterwards I was sent for to lay hands upon Sister Patten, the
widow of David W. Patten, who was living in the room adjoining mine,
and who was seized in a similar manner to my wife.

My wife continued quite feeble for several days from the shock.

One day while visiting Joseph, he took me for a walk by the river side,
when he requested me to relate the occurrence at Brother Bozier's.
After I had done so, I also told him the vision of evil spirits in
England, on the opening of the gospel to that people. After I had done
this, I asked him what all these things meant, and whether or not there
was anything wrong in me. He said:

"No, Brother Heber; at that time, when you were in England, you were
nigh unto the Lord, there was only a veil between you and Him, but you
could not see Him. When I heard of it, it gave me great joy; for I then
knew that the work of God had taken root in that land. It was this that
caused the devil to make a struggle to kill you."

Joseph then said the nearer a person approached to the Lord,
the greater power would be manifest by the devil to prevent the
accomplishment of the purposes of God.

He also gave me a relation of many contests that he had had with Satan,
and his power that had been manifested from time to time since the
commencement of bringing forth the Book of Mormon.

I will relate one circumstance that took place in Far West, in a house
which Joseph had purchased, which had been formerly occupied as a
public house by some wicked people. A short time after he had moved
into it, one of the children was taken very sick. He laid his hands
upon the child, when it got better. As soon as he went outside, the
child was taken sick again. He again laid his hands upon it, so that
it again recovered. This transpired several times, and Joseph inquired
of the Lord what it all meant, when he had an open vision, and saw
the devil in person, who contended with Joseph face to face for some
time. He said it was his house, it belonged to him, and Joseph had no
right there. Then Joseph rebuked Satan in the name of the Lord, and he
departed and troubled the child no more.

On the 2nd of July, I went with Joseph, Hyrum, Sidney and others over
the river to Montrose, after which we rode four miles and looked at
the site for the town of Zarahemla. We dined at Brother Woodruff's.
After dinner we all went to President Brigham Young's, where Brothers
Woodruff and George A. Smith were blessed as two of the Twelve
Apostles. Brother Hyrum Smith gave the Twelve some good advice on
the nature of their mission--to practice prudence and humility in
their preaching, and to strictly hold on to the authority of the
Priesthood. Brother Joseph taught many glorious things and important
principles to benefit and bless them on their mission; advising them to
observe charity, wisdom and a fellow feeling for each other under all
circumstances. He also unfolded the keys of knowledge, to detect Satan,
and preserve us in the favor of God.

On Sunday, the 7th of July, I was present at a large meeting of the
Saints in the open air to listen to the farewell addresses of the
Twelve. Many were present who did not belong to the Church. After the
meeting was dismissed three persons went forward and were baptized and
confirmed.

On the 10th of July, Elder P. P. Pratt returned from his imprisonment
in Missouri. When I heard that he was in Quincy I went there and
assisted him and his brother Orson up to Commerce. His escape caused
much rejoicing among the Saints.

In a few days afterwards he and I purchased from Hyrum Kimball five
acres each of woodland, situated one mile from the river, and went to
work to cut each a set of logs to build a house 14 by 16 feet, which
we cut in one day. We then invited some of the old citizens, such as
Brother Bozier, 'Squire Wells, Louis Robinson and others, to come and
assist us to put them up, as our people were mostly prostrate with
sickness. I got a man to assist me to hew puncheons for the floor,
and to make some shakes, that is, strips of timber similar to barrel
staves, with which to cover the roof. I also drew the rock and built
a chimney, and just got it built to the ridge of the house, when I
was stricken down with the chills and fever. My wife was also laid
prostrate with the same.

A great amount of sickness prevailed among the inhabitants of Commerce,
in consequence of the sufferings and hardships to which they had been
subjected in being driven from Missouri; so that the time of those
who were able to be about was generally spent in administering to the
sick. Some had faith and were healed; to those who had not faith we
administered mild herbs and nursed them as well as possible under the
circumstances; but many died.

On the morning of the 22nd, the Prophet Joseph Smith arose from his
bed of sickness, when the power of God rested upon him, and he went
forth administering to the sick. He commenced with the sick in his
own house, then visited those who were tenting in his door-yard,
commanding the sick in the name of the Lord Jesus Christ to arise from
their beds and be made whole, and they were healed according to his
words. He then went from house to house and from tent to tent, on the
bank of the river, healing the sick by the power of Israel's God as he
went among them. He did not miss a single house, wagon or tent, and
continued this work up to the "Upper Stone House," where he crossed
the river, accompanied by P. P. Pratt, O. Pratt, John Taylor, John E.
Page and myself, and walked into the cabin of Brother Brigham Young,
who was lying very sick, and commanded him in the name of the Lord
Jesus to arise and be made whole. He arose, healed of his sickness,
and accompanied Joseph and his brethren of the Twelve. They went into
the house of Brother Elijah Fordham, who was insensible and considered
by his family and friends to be dying. Joseph stepped to his bedside,
looked him in the eye for a minute without speaking, then took him by
the hand and commanded him in the name of Jesus Christ to arise from
his bed and walk. Brother Fordham instantly leaped out of his bed,
threw off all his poultices and bandages, dressed himself, called for
a bowl of bread and milk, which he ate, and then followed us into the
street.

We then went into the house of Joseph B. Noble, who was also very sick,
and he was healed in the same manner.

Joseph spoke with the voice and power of God.

When he had healed all the sick by the power given unto him, he went
down to the ferry boat, when a stranger rode up almost breathless and
said he had heard that "Jo" Smith was raising the dead and healing all
the sick, and his wife begged of him to ride up and get Mr. Smith to
go down and heal his twin children, who were about five months old.
Joseph replied, "I cannot go, but will send some one." In a few minutes
he said to Elder Woodruff, who lived in Montrose, "You go and heal
those children. Take this pocket handkerchief, and when you administer
to them, wipe their faces with it, and they shall recover." Brother
Woodruff did as he was commanded, and the children were healed.

The mob leaders when they saw men, whom they thought were dying, arise
from their beds and pray for others, stood paralyzed with fear, yet
those same men would have killed Joseph and his brethren if they had
had an opportunity.

Joseph recrossed the river and returned to his own house, and I went to
my home, rejoicing in the mercies and goodness of God.

This was a day never to be forgotten by the Saints, nor by the wicked,
for they saw the power of God manifest in the flesh.



CHAPTER XV.

START UPON A MISSION UNDER DISTRESSING CIRCUMSTANCES--INCIDENTS OF THE
JOURNEY--A DRUNKEN DOCTOR GIVES ME A TABLE-SPOONFUL OF MORPHINE--MY
LIFE SAVED THROUGH THE PRAYER OF FAITH--BRETHREN LEAVE ME TO PROCEED TO
KIRTLAND--THEIR FEAR THAT I WOULD DIE--I PREDICT THAT I WOULD RECOVER
AND REACH KIRTLAND BEFORE THEM.

On the 4th of August, the Saints met to partake of the sacrament, and
received an exhortation from the Prophet, impressing upon them the
necessity of being righteous and clean of heart before the Lord, and
commanding the Twelve to go forth without purse or scrip; according to
the revelations of Jesus Christ.

My son David Patten was born during the night of the 23d in the log
cabin which I had put up at the end of the Bozier house, and during the
night we had a heavy thunder storm, but the hand of the Lord was over
us.

As soon as my wife was able, I moved my family into the log house that
I had built. Being without a house, Brother Orson Pratt moved his
family in with mine.

On the 4th of September, President Brigham Young left his home at
Montrose to start upon his mission to England. He was so sick that
he was unable to go to the river, a distance of thirty rods, without
assistance. After he had crossed the river, he rode behind Israel
Barlow on his horse to my house, where he continued sick until the
18th. He left his wife sick with a babe only ten days old, and all his
other children were sick and unable to wait upon one another. Not one
of them was able to go to the well for a pail of water, and they were
without a single change of clothes, for the mob in Missouri had taken
nearly all he had.

On the 17th, Sister Mary Ann Young got a boy to carry her up in his
wagon to my house, that she might nurse and comfort Brother Brigham to
the hour of starting.

On the 18th, Charles Hubbard sent a boy with a wagon and span of horses
to my house to start us on our journey. Our trunks were put into the
wagon by some of the brethren who had come to bid us farewell.

I went to my bed and shook hands with my wife, who was then shaking
with the ague, and had two of our children lying sick by her side. I
embraced her and my children, and bade them farewell. The only child
well was little Heber Parley, and it was with difficulty that he could
carry a couple of quarts of water at a time, to assist in quenching
their thirst.

With some difficulty we got into the wagon and started down the hill
about ten rods. It seemed to me as though my very inmost parts would
melt within me at the thought of leaving my family in such a condition,
as it were almost in the arms of death. I felt as though I could
scarcely endure it. I said to the teamster "hold up!" then turning to
Brother Brigham I added, "This is pretty tough, but let's rise, and
give them a cheer." We arose, and swinging our hats three times over
our heads, we cried, "Hurrah, hurrah, hurrah for Israel!"

My wife, hearing the noise, arose from her bed and came to the door to
see what was up. She had a smile on her face. She and Sister Young then
cried out to us, "Good bye; God bless you!" We returned the compliment,
and were pleased to see that they were so cheerful. We then told the
driver to go ahead.

After this I felt a spirit of joy and gratitude at having the
satisfaction of seeing my wife standing upon her feet, instead of
leaving her in bed, knowing well that I should not see her again for
two or three years.

We were without purse or scrip, and were carried across the prairie,
about fourteen miles, to a shanty near the railway, where Brother O. M.
Duell lived.

On arriving there, we were unable to carry our small trunks into the
house, and Sister Duell, seeing our feeble condition, assisted the boy
to carry them in. We were very much fatigued, and as soon as we got
into the house Sister Duell made us a cup of tea; which revived us,
and prepared a bed for us on a one-legged bedstead in a corner of the
house, having two poles running from the house logs to the leg.

In the course of the night our bedstead broke through, and we found
ourselves on the floor, between the poles and the side of the house.

The following day Brother Duell took us in his wagon to Lima, about
twelve miles, when he left us. He gave each of us a dollar to assist us
on our journey. Brother Bidwell then carried us in his wagon to John A.
Mikesell's, near Quincy, about twenty miles.

The fatigue of this day's journey was too much for our feeble health;
we were prostrated, and obliged to tarry a few days in Quincy to
recruit.

The brethren preached a few times in a meeting house close to the
Congregational church. The members of the latter church were in
the habit of commencing their meetings at different hours from the
brethren, but they took a notion to disturb us, by ringing their bell
furiously after we had commenced our meetings. At one time Elder John
E. Page preached so loud as to drown the noise of the bell, and this
brought some hundreds, who otherwise would not have come, to meeting.

I was prostrate with the chills and fever, and stayed most of the time
at the house of Sisters Laura and Abigail Pitkin, who bestowed every
kindness upon me they possibly could. Dr. Orlando Hovey, and Sister
Staley and her daughter were also very kind in administering to me in
my feeble condition.

We left Quincy September 25th, feeling much better. My sorrow was great
to see so many of our brethren there sick and dying, in consequence of
being driven and exposed to hunger and cold.

Brother Lyman Wight took us in a one-horse wagon to Brother Charles C.
Rich's, at Burton; where we stayed through the night. Brother Wight
predicted many good things, and left this blessing with us, when he
bade us farewell.

The following day while Brother Rich was taking us to Brother Wilbur's,
the chills came on me again, and I suffered much pain and fatigue.

On the 27th, Brother Wilbur took us in a buggy about twenty-five miles
to the house of James Allred, in Pittsfield, and the following day
Father Allred conveyed us to the place where Brother Harlow Redfield
lived, where we preached to a small branch of the Church on Sunday, the
29th.

On the 30th, Brother Rodgers carried Brother Brigham to Brother
Decker's, and me to the house of Mr. Roswell Murray, my father-in-law.
They were living within a few rods of each other, near Winchester, in
Scott County.

Here we also found a few brethren in the Church, who had been smitten
and robbed of their property in Missouri, but were once more in
comfortable circumstances and rejoicing in the Lord.

On the 1st of October, we were conveyed to Lorenzo D. Young's, where we
remained and recruited our strength until the 4th, when he conveyed us
to Jacksonville.

On the 5th, a sister in the Church hired a horse and buggy to take us
to Springfield, a distance of thirty-five miles, and Brother Babcock
drove for us. There we were kindly received by brethren, and nursed.
Brother Brigham being confined to his bed by sickness, Brother Libeus
T. Coon, who was practicing medicine, waited upon him. Here we found
Brothers G. A. Smith, T. Turley and R. Hedlock.

I went from house to house strengthening and comforting the brethren,
and teaching them the things of the kingdom. I was so far recovered
that I preached on the Sabbath, which caused a great feeling of love
towards us. The Saints got a two horse wagon and harness for us, for
which they paid fifty-five dollars, and also collected thirty-five
dollars in money for the company. Judge Adams, of the supreme court,
took me to his house. I stayed with him three nights and the greater
part of three days, and he gave me five dollars when I left.

While we remained at Springfield, the sisters fitted up a bed in the
wagon for Brother Brigham to ride on, as he was unable to sit up.

On the 11th of October, I resumed my journey, in company with Brothers
Young, Turley, Smith and Hedlock.

We traveled eight miles and put up at the house of Father Draper.
When we went into the house, Brother George A. Smith, while stooping
down to warm at the fire, dropped a small flask bottle, containing
tonic bitters, out of his pocket on the hearth, and broke it. At this
occurrence, Father Draper was very much astonished, and said, "You are
a pretty set of Apostles, to be carrying a bottle of whisky with you!"

We explained to him that the bottle contained some bitters which the
brethren at Springfield had prepared for Brother George A., because of
his sickness. This appeased his righteous soul, so that he consented to
allow us to stay through the night.

On the following day, we pursued our journey towards Terre Haute, most
of the brethren being very sick. Owing to the bad roads, I walked most
of the way. At might I slept in a wagon and caught cold. The next
morning I had to go till twelve o'clock before I had anything to eat,
and then it was transparent pork and corn dodger. My health again began
to fail. The wagon broke down twice and the chills came on me about two
in the afternoon and held me till night, then the fever held me all
night. I had the chills and fever three days, and lost my appetite. The
third chill was so severe that it seemed as though I could not live
till night.

We arrived at Terre Haute about dusk on the 17th. Brother Young and I
put up at Dr. Modisett's, and the other brethren and Father Murray,
my father-in-law, who had accompanied us on a visit to his friends in
the east, stayed at Milton Stowe's, who lived in one of the doctor's
houses. In the evening the doctor went to see them, as they were quite
ill, and Brother Stowe was very poor. The doctor expressed great
sympathy for them when he returned to his house, * * seeing them in ill
health and lying on a straw bed on the floor. He shed many tears at
thoughts of the brethren going under such suffering circumstances upon
such a long mission; but he did not have quite sympathy enough to buy
them a chicken to make them some broth, or even give them a shilling,
although he was worth four or five hundred thousand dollars. He said
his taxes amounted to over four hundred dollars a year.

In the evening I became very ill. The doctor said he could give me
something that would do me good and relieve me of my distress, and I
would probably get a nap; but the old man was so drunk that he did
not know what he did, and he gave me a table-spoonfull of morphine.
His wife saw him pour it out; but dared not say a word, although she
believed it would kill me.

In a few minutes after I took it, I straightened up in my chair,
complaining of feeling very strangely, and as though I wanted to lie
down. On my attempting to go to the bed, I reeled and fell to the
floor. There was hardly a breath of life in my body. Brother Brigham
rolled me over on my back, put a pillow under my head and inquired of
the doctor what he had given me, and then learned that he had given me
morphine. I lay there for a long time; when I came to, Brother Brigham
was attending to me with a fatherly care, and manifesting much anxiety
in my behalf. I remarked, "Don't be scared; for I shan't die."

In a short time after, he got me on the bed, and nursed me through
the night. I commenced vomiting and continued doing so most of the
night. He changed my under-clothes five times, and washed me each
time previous to changing, as I was covered with a cold sweat. It was
through the closest attention of Brother Young and the family that my
life was preserved through the night. I was scarcely able to speak so
as to be understood.

In the morning, Brothers Smith, Turley, Hedlock and Father Murray came
to see us, and the brethren laid their hands upon me and prayed for
me. When they left they wept like children. Father Murray felt very
sorrowful. Said he, "We shall never see Heber again; he will die."
I looked up at them and said, "Never mind, brethren; go ahead, for
Brother Brigham and I will reach Kirtland before you will." Brother
Brigham gave them all the money we had except five dollars, and told
them to take good care of the team and make all possible speed to
Kirtland. They started the same day. In about an hour after their
departure I arose from my bed.



CHAPTER XVI.

FURTHER INCIDENTS OF THE JOURNEY--MONEY INCREASED BY THE POWER
OF GOD--ARRIVE AT KIRTLAND AHEAD OF BRETHREN, IN FULFILLMENT OF
MY PREDICTION--SERVICES IN THE TEMPLE--VISIT MY OLD HOME AND MY
RELATIVES--KIND TREATMENT--ARRIVE IN NEW YORK--JOYFUL MEETING WITH
BRETHREN.

On the 22nd of October, Elder Almon W. Babbitt and Dr. Knight, an
eminent physician, came from Pleasant Garden to see me, and the next
day Brother James Modisett took us in his father's carriage twenty
miles, to the house of Brother Addison Pratt. From there we were
conveyed by Dr. Knight to Pleasant Garden, and put up with Brother
Jonathan Crosby. We found a few brethren there, who were well and in
good spirits. We remained three days, preaching to the few brethren and
those who wished to hear. * * *

Before leaving, Dr. Knight and some others gave us some money to
assist us on our mission. While there I also received a letter from my
wife, giving an account of her sickness since I left, also that of our
children, William and Helen. I wrote her a comforting letter in reply,
praying the Lord to bless her and the little ones.

On the 26th, Brother Babbitt took us in his buggy twelve miles, to the
house of Brother Scott, whose family was very glad to see us, and we
tarried with them through the night, after which Brother Scott sent his
little son, John, to convey us to Bellville, fifteen miles, several
miles of the journey in a rain storm, which obliged us to put up at
an inn for the remainder of the day and night. Brother Brigham was
very sick, and had to go to bed. I sat up to wait upon him, and spent
the evening with the landlord and his lady, preaching to them. They
received our testimony, and were very kind to us.

The following morning the landlord arose very early, and talked to
the citizens about the travelers who had stayed with him the night
previous, and what he had heard us say concerning the gospel. The
neighbors flocked in; made many enquiries and were very anxious that we
should tarry and preach in the place.

Our host said several times he hoped the stage would not come, that we
might stay and preach, as the people were very much excited on account
of a great discussion which had recently occurred between two popular
preachers.

The stage, however, came along about ten o'clock, and we started on our
way towards Kirtland, leaving the landlord in tears.

The money given to us in Pleasant Garden added to the five dollars we
had left when the brethren parted from us on the 18th, amounted to
thirteen dollars and fifty cents. When we got into the stage we did not
expect to ride many miles. We rode, however, as far as Indianapolis,
paid our passage, and found we had sufficient means to carry us to
Richmond, Indiana. When we arrived in Richmond, we found we had means
to take us to Dayton, to which place we proceeded and tarried over
night, waiting for another line of stages. We expected to stop here
and preach until we got means to pursue our journey. Brother Brigham,
however, went to his trunk to get money to pay the bill and found we
had sufficient to pay our passage to Columbus, to which place we took
passage in the stage and tarried over night. When he paid the next
bill, he found he had sufficient means to pay our passage to Worcester,
and accordingly we took passage for that place. When we arrived there,
Brother Brigham went to his trunk again to get money to pay, and found
sufficient to pay our passage to Cleveland.

While on our way to Cleveland, and within about twenty miles of that
place we passed a little town called Strongsville. Brother Brigham had
a strong impression to stop at a tavern when we first came into that
town; but as the stage did not stop there we went on.

We arrived at Cleveland about eleven o'clock at night, took lodgings
and remained till next morning.

On the morning of November 3rd, it being Sunday, we went to the
Episcopalian church, and while returning to the hotel, we met my
father-in-law, and learned that Elders Smith, Turley and Hedlock had
just arrived in Cleveland. Father Murray was as much astonished to see
me alive as though he had seen one risen from the dead. I don't think I
ever saw a man feel better than he did when I met him in the street.

We walked with him a short distance and met the brethren, whose
health was good compared with what it had been, and who were in fine
spirits. We learned that they had stayed over night at the tavern
in Strongsville, where Brother Brigham had such a strong impression
to stop the night previous. They had picked up Elder John Taylor at
Dayton, where he was left at a tavern very sick with the ague a few
days before, by Father Coltrin, who proceeded to Kirtland.

Brothers Taylor and Hedlock got into the stage with us, which left
early in the afternoon, and rode as far as Willoughby. We proceeded
to Kirtland and arrived the same evening, where we found a good many
brethren and friends, who were glad to see us. Thus was the prediction
fulfilled which I made on my sick bed, in regard to reaching Kirtland
before my brethren.

Brother Brigham had one York shilling left, and on looking over our
expenses, we found we had paid out over eighty-seven dollars out of
the thirteen dollars and fifty cents we had at Pleasant Garden, which
was all the money we had to pay our passage with. We had traveled over
four hundred miles by stage, for which we paid from eight to ten cents
a mile, and had taken three meals a day, for each of which we were
charged fifty cents, also fifty cents for our lodgings. Brother Brigham
often suspected that I put the money in his trunk or clothes, thinking
that I had a purse of money which I had not acquainted him with; but
this was not so; the money could only have been put in his trunk by
some heavenly messenger, who thus administered to our necessities daily
as he knew we needed.

There was a division of sentiment among the brethren in Kirtland, many
of whom lacked the energy to move to Missouri, and some lacked the
disposition.

On Sunday, the 10th of November, Elder John Taylor preached in the
temple in the forenoon, and I preached in the afternoon. I had great
freedom in speaking, and compared my hearers to a parcel of old earthen
pots that were cracked in burning, for they were mostly apostates who
were living there.

Immediately after I returned to the house of Ira Bond, Martin Harris,
Cyrus Smalling and others came in and attacked me on what I had been
saying, asking me who I referred to in my comparisons. I answered, "To
no one in particular, but to anyone that the coat fits." I was so sick
that I referred them to Brother Hedlock, who came in at that moment,
to talk with, as I was lying on a bed, having a chill, and not able
to talk. John Moreton and others declared I should never preach in
the house again. Some of the people tried to make me angry, so as to
quarrel with me, but they failed.

I made my home at Dean Gould's, in the house of Ira Bond. They were all
very kind to me. I staid with them most of the time I was in Kirtland,
during which the weather was very stormy.

I was thankful to get rid of the chills that time without the aid of
medicine, but I continued afflicted with a cough which I caught by
riding in the stage at night.

On Sunday, the 17th, Brother Brigham preached in the forenoon, and
Brother John Taylor in the afternoon. In the evening Brother Brigham
anointed Brother John Taylor in the house of the Lord, he having
previously washed himself in pure water; then we all went to the
temple. I was called upon and opened the meeting by prayer, when
Brigham anointed him with pure sweet oil and pronounced such blessings
upon him as the Spirit gave utterance to, and Brother Taylor then arose
and prayed.

Brother Theodore Turley, one of the Seventies, was then anointed by
Daniel S. Miles one of the presidents of the Seventies; both of which
anointings were sealed by loud shouts of hosannah. Then their feet were
washed and the meeting closed.

A council was held with Brothers Kellog, Moreton and others, who took
the lead in Kirtland. We proposed that some of the Elders should remain
there and preach for a few weeks, but John Moreton replied that they
had had many talented preachers, and he considered that men of such
ordinary ability as the missionaries of our party possessed could do no
good in Kirtland; he thought possibly that Brother John Taylor _might_
do, but he was not sure.

Kirtland at that time was a desolate looking place, about one-half of
the houses being empty and going to ruin.

We had but little means to prosecute our journey, but, God being our
helper, we felt to press our way onward.

I left there with my brethren on the 22nd of November, and went
to Fairport. There we were detained till the 26th on account of a
tremendous snow storm. Our board cost us fifteen dollars while there.
We boarded a boat and landed at Buffalo on the 27th, in the morning,
and proceeded by stage to Batavia, where we arrived in the evening. The
next afternoon, we took the cars for Rochester.

When we got to Byron, I got out and left the brethren, supposing Harvy
Hall, my brother-in-law, was living there. I had scarcely left the cars
when I was informed that he had gone to Rochester. I think I never felt
worse in my life, my anticipations were so great to see him, and I
could not get away till the next night. Just at evening, I got aboard
the cars and arrived at Hall's at eight the next evening, where I was
joyfully received. I staid there one week, and was confined to my bed
some of the time. I had to take deck passage on the steamboat for the
want of means, and took cold and it settled in my right side. I was so
bad that I could hardly draw my breath.

A letter from my wife reached Mendon, my old home about three weeks
before I did. Sister Hall was at my brother Solomon's, and advised him
to take it out. He did so, and opened it, but could not tell where I
was. Supposing that I was dead, my relatives were feeling very badly
when I arrived there. I was taken to my brother Solomon's, and he and
his family were all rejoiced to see me once more in the land of the
living.

Nathaniel Campbell, my wife's brother-in-law, came and took me home
with him to Victor. I received great kindness from them and from all my
old friends. Several of the neighbors came in while I was there, and
my wife's sister introduced me as her "Mormon" brother. They seemed
to take a great interest in our sufferings, and this seemed to be the
feeling of all candid people.

I was urged by my friends to return and bring my family, and remain
with them, or at least to stop there till warm weather, on account of
my poor health, as a little fatigue would bring me down again. However,
I knew it would not do, as "no man, having put his hand to the plow,
and looking back, is fit for the kingdom of God."

I preached in Mendon school house Sunday, December 21st, at one
o'clock. The house was full. Then in the evening again there was an
appointment for their Methodist preacher, but as he did not come,
nothing would do but I must preach. I also preached at Miller's Corner.
There seemed to be a great desire to hear, but my health would not
permit me to speak much.

On the 29th, Brother William E. Murray came through the snow up to
his horses' sides, determined to have me go home with him. It was as
much as we could do to get to his house. It was a pleasure to me to
see them. William said to me, "When you want to pray, Heber, use your
liberty." He and his family seemed to take much pleasure in the things
of God; and on the first day of the year 1840, I went into the water
and baptized him and his wife. He gave me a little money, a pair of
pantaloons and a pair of drawers, and would have given me fifty dollars
if he had had it. My sister, Mrs. Wheeler, gave me another pair of
drawers and two fine shirts, and a shawl to wear around my neck. An old
friend, John E. Tomlinson, gave me a dollar and said if I would come
again he'd give me more. These, with Brother Wheeler, were the only
ones who would help me upon my mission. Others were willing to assist
me if I would only forsake my "Mormonism" and come back and live with
them; but I felt that I would rather live in a cave, or be driven with
the Saints every other year while I lived, and be one with them, than
to apostatize and have all the good things of the earth, for I would
feel myself disgraced in the sight of God and man.

On the 6th of January, I preached in Mendon for the fourth time. I also
had calls to preach in other parts of the town, as well as other towns
in that region. The Baptist church that I had formerly been a member
of, had about died out.

While in Victor, I had several calls to go to Pike. After being much
wrought upon, I consented to go. William Murray and wife accompanied
me. We got to the house of my old friend, Adolphus Huit, the first day
of February. I never saw a person more pleased than his wife was to see
me; she said that she had been calling on the Lord that He would send
me there.

On Sunday morning we went to the Christian chapel. After the meeting
was through, an appointment was given out for me to preach on Monday
evening. The church leaders said they were willing that I should
preach, because the people were in such a cold state that I could not
have any effect upon them.

When the time came, I went and found the house crowded. My text was
from the 2nd Epistle of John, 9th, 10th and 11th verses. When I was
almost through, two of the ministers came into the pulpit. I gave them
permission to speak, when one Baptist arose and found fault with me
because I had preached from the Bible.

When he had sat down, I answered him, and then three others followed
his example, and I answered each in turn. They were confounded, and the
discussion tended to open the eyes of the people.

I afterwards baptized Mrs. Huit, and many others believed. I only
preached once and then returned to Victor.

On the 10th, I started for New York, and reached Albany on the 12th.
Mr. Wheeler, my brother-in-law, stayed with me all night at the hotel
and paid my bill. He thought me unwise to go any farther, but the next
day I took coach for New York.

I went up on the east side of the river, crossed the Catskill
Mountains, and took three days to get to Jersey City, traveling part of
the way by sleigh. When I arrived at Jersey City, I had not one penny
left, and could not cross the river without paying twenty-five cents. I
informed the person in charge of the boat that I was out of money, and
a gentleman who overheard me gave me twenty-five cents. I crossed the
river into New York at nine o'clock at night, went to the Western Hotel
and pawned my trunk to pay for lodging. I had only eaten one meal a day
while traveling to New York, for want of money to buy more, but I did
not suffer from hunger.

The next morning, I went in search of some of the Saints, and soon
found Brothers Parley P. and Orson Pratt and Brigham Young, who were
glad to see me. I went to meeting with them and found one hundred and
fifty Saints assembled. It was a great pleasure to meet with them. They
were very kind to me, and soon provided me with money to redeem my
trunk.

I found a letter in New York from my wife, which had lain in the office
for a long time, and I was thankful to hear that she and our children
were better.

Soon after I arrived in New York, Orson Pratt and I were called upon
to visit a sick woman, who was unable to turn herself in bed without
assistance. We anointed her with oil in the name of the Lord, and she
was made whole. She did not belong to the Church, nor did her husband,
but in two days afterwards she and her husband were baptized, and
fourteen others.

I was detained in New York about four weeks, being unable to obtain
passage on a packet ship, as the owners of vessels found it more
profitable to carry freight than passengers. Brothers Woodruff,
Taylor, Clark, Mulliner, White and Turley had already gone to England,
and Brother George A. Smith, on account of sickness, had gone to
Philadelphia.

We were not idle, however, while we remained. We had calls to preach on
every hand. I attended a meeting almost every night and was generally
kept up talking till midnight or past.

As a result of our labors, many new members were added to the Church
and fresh zeal was infused into the old ones. The Saints were very kind
to us, and provided liberally for our wants, and when we were ready to
sail they supplied us with money to pay our passage, and many tempting
delicacies as well as more substantial food to serve us on the voyage,
besides clothing and bedding.

In company with Elders Brigham Young, Orson Pratt, George A. Smith,
Parley P. Pratt and R. Hedlock, I took passage for England on the ship
_Patrick Henry_, on the 7th of March, 1840. A large number of the
Saints came down to the wharf to bid us farewell. When we got into the
small boat to go to the ship the Saints on shore sang "The Gallant Ship
is Under Way," in which song we joined until the sound of our voices
was lost in the distance. I may also add that previous to starting we
held a conference with the Saints in New York, at which, by unanimous
vote of those present, a "letter of recommendation" was given me,
signed, in behalf of the Saints, by the presiding Elder of the Branch
and clerk of the conference, testifying of my "wisdom, understanding,
meekness and humility," and recommending me "as an upright, honest,
candid man, and a faithful minister of the gospel."



CHAPTER XVII.

INCIDENTS OF ELDER KIMBALL'S MISSION, AS GLEANED FROM HIS LETTERS--SOME
OF HIS PROPHECIES FULFILLED--ELDER HYDE'S ACCOUNT OF THE CONTEST
WITH EVIL SPIRITS--GREAT SUCCESS OF THE WORK THROUGHOUT ENGLAND--A
TESTIMONIAL--SUMMARY OF LABORS--RETURN TO NAUVOO.

Elder Kimball's journal containing an account of his mission after
leaving New York having been lost, it has been necessary to refer to
letters written to his family for further particulars.

After a very stormy passage, he and his brethren arrived in Liverpool
on the 6th of the April, 1840, where they met Elders Taylor and
Fielding. Three days later he went by train to Preston. On reaching
Penwortham, three miles from Preston he learned that the Saints had
been anxiously expecting him for months. He found many friends standing
by the railway watching for him. It was a happy meeting. There was
great rejoicing among the Saints, and no little excitement and disgust
among their enemies, who had declared that he and his associate Elders
should never come to that land again. Many ministers were very much
exercised over their presence and were in favor of petitioning the
heads of government to interfere with their proselyting. They had cause
to fear, as the labors of the Elders had already resulted in breaking
up many churches.

On the 14th of April, the Elders met to organize, when Elder Willard
Richards was ordained to the Apostleship and Brigham Young chosen
President. The following day a general conference was held, at which
one thousand seven hundred and twenty members of the Church were
represented, exclusive of a large number scatted about in different
parts of the land, whose standing was not known.

On the 18th, he accompanied Elder Willard Richards to the little branch
at Walkerford, where, it will be remembered, Elder Kimball was first
invited to come and preach by the Rev. Mr. Richards, whose daughter he
had previously baptized. This daughter in the meantime had been married
to Elder Willard Richards. And right here it may be as well to remark,
in illustration of Elder Kimball's prophetic character, that this
marriage was in fulfillment of a prediction which he made immediately
after baptizing Miss Jeannette Richards. On meeting Elder Richards,
he exclaimed, "Willard, I have baptized your wife to day!" A similar
prediction was made by him about the marriage of Elder Joseph Fielding,
and as literally fulfilled.

Since Elder Kimball's first visit to Walkerford, the few Saints there
had suffered a great deal of persecution, still most of them had
remained firm in the faith. It would appear, however, that Mr. John
Richards had got to feel rather sore over the change in his prospects
since having his church members converted to "Mormonism," for on seeing
Elder Kimball again at his house in company with Elder Richards, he
ordered him to leave. Brother Kimball, in writing of this, says: "I
went out and pursued my journey. I could hear the old lady and Sister
Richards crying when I got into the road. I felt to weep for them. She
is a mother indeed, who has fed me and given me money and administered
to my wants, and will not lose her reward."

Elder Kimball makes frequent mention of the love which the Saints
manifested for him. While staying at the house of Brother Thomas Smith,
in Clitheroe, he one morning overheard one of the daughters of the
house say to her mother, "I want you should make Brother Kimball as
comfortable as possible, and I will work in the factory as hard as I
can."

His sympathy was frequently aroused by meeting with Saints who had
been in comfortable circumstances when he knew them on his former
mission, but who, through being thrown out of employment, were reduced
to want, and would weep at not being able to set food before him as
they had formerly done. In visiting Eccleston and Dauber's Lane and
the surrounding region, he was received with a perfect ovation by
the Saints, and they everywhere urged him to tarry with them. At a
village called Chatburn, where he and Elder Fielding went to preach,
no house could be found large enough for the people to convene in who
turned out to hear them, and they held a meeting in a large barn, with
most excellent results. Of this place and its people, he wrote: "Some
who had left the Church wished they had been faithful; and some did
return by humble repentance and being re-baptized. There appears to be
something peculiar in the people of this place; others had tried in
vain to enlist them in their folds, but on hearing the first preaching
of the fullness of the gospel they were overwhelmed in tears of
repentance and more than twenty were immediately baptized, which number
was afterwards increased to about ninety, who have generally kept the
faith. We have never received anything like an insult all the times we
visited the village, and we feel bound to bless them."

On visiting Southport, a celebrated bathing place, and a great resort
for rich people in search of health, he says, "There I beheld halt and
blind, deaf and maimed and leprous. Such a distressed set of beings
I never saw before. At this place there was a sister sick, and not
expected to live. She was healed by administering the ordinances, and
the next day she went with us two miles on foot."

Of the fraternal feeling that prevailed among the Saints, he says, "The
rich love the poor so well they cannot bear to leave them behind. This
is a celestial spirit; I would to God that all the Saints had it. There
is one peculiarity about the people--just as soon as they come out of
the water they want to go to America. When they begin to gather to Zion
from this land, it will never stop till the salt is drained out of all
nations. These are some of the jewels of the earth."

On the 4th of August he started on a visit to London, calling on the
way at Burslem, where he remained and spent a holiday with the Saints
and preached to six or seven thousand people in the public park. He
also stopped at West Bromwich, Birmingham, Ledbury, Cheltenham, and
several other places, and visited with the Saints, held a number of
meetings and baptized quite a number. On reaching London, he went in
search of the officers of the Teetotal Society, on account of the
kindness they had shown him on his first mission, in opening their
halls for him to preach in when others refused to. He found them very
friendly and willing to assist him in any way possible. In company
with Elders Woodruff and George A. Smith, he also visited Westminister
Abbey and the Queen's Palace. In alluding to the latter and the
lavish extravagance that he witnessed, he wrote, "Americans would be
astonished to see the stir there is made over a little queen; at the
same time there are thousands starving to death for want of a little
bread; but they have their reward: 'Blessed are the poor, for they
shall rejoice in the Holy One of Israel.' The rich have their reward
here, and we shall have ours hereafter; so I do not envy them."

He found London the most difficult place to make any impression
in of any that he had visited. It would seem as if the devil took
special pains to do all he could to prevent the Elders from gaining a
foothold there. On the 19th of September, while there, Elder Kimball
was stricken with the cholera, and he felt as if he could not live
till morning, but he rallied and commenced again as zealously as
ever laboring for the conversion of the people. In writing of their
discouraging labors, he said:

"Brother Woodruff had been gone about two weeks and we had baptized
only one here in the city before he left. He felt almost discouraged,
and said he never saw such a hard case before--every door closed
against us, and every heart. We have traveled from day to day, from
one part of the city to the other, to find some one that would receive
our testimony. It seemed all in vain for some time; at last we found
one old Cornelius that was ready to receive our testimony as soon as
he heard it. On Sunday, the morning after I was taken with cholera, I
went forward and baptized four. I thought it would do me good to go
into a cold bath. Last night I went into the water and baptized four
more. Some more are going on Sunday. The ice is broken in London, and
the gospel has got such a hold that the devil can not root it out; but
he is very mad, and I am glad--I shall never try to please him, the
Lord assisting me. I see nothing to discourage me but everything to the
reverse."

When the devil offers determined opposition, it may be considered as
a sure indication that he is losing ground, and that his fears are
awakened. Elder Kimball had had sufficient experience in contending
with him to learn this fact, and to rejoice at seeing the evil one
aroused. It will be remembered that the first success of the Elders
in the English mission aroused hostility in that quarter, and Elders
Kimball, Hyde and Russell had a personal contest with evil spirits.
As the allusion to that occasion published on page 20 is quite brief
[see chapter II, paragraph beginning with "One Saturday evening I was
appointed by the brethren...."--Transcriber], it may be as well to
insert here Elder Hyde's description of the scene, as contained in a
letter to Elder Kimball, written May 22, 1856. He said:

"Every circumstance that occurred at that scene of devils is just as
fresh in my recollection at this moment as it was at the moment of
its occurrence, and will ever remain so. After you were overcome by
them and had fallen, their awful rush upon me with knives, threats,
imprecations and hellish grins amply convinced me that they were no
friends of mine. While you were apparently senseless and lifeless on
the floor and upon the bed (after we laid you there), I stood between
you and the devils and fought them and contended against them face to
face until they began to diminish in number, and to retreat from the
room. The last imp that left turned round to me as he was going out
and said, as if to apologize and appease my determined opposition to
them, 'I never said anything against you!' I replied to him thus: 'It
matters not to me whether you have or have not; you are a liar from the
beginning! In the name of Jesus Christ, depart!' He immediately left,
and the room was clear. That closed the scene of devils for that time."

In writing of London some time afterwards, Elder Kimball said, "The
waters have begun to be troubled, and I pray that they may continue
until the Lord gathers out His people from this city. I can say I never
felt a greater desire for a place than I have for London, as it is the
metropolis of the world and the depot of wickedness, for it don't seem
as though any place could be any worse. All manner of debauchery that
can be thought of is practiced here."

Elders Kimball and George A. Smith left London October 1, 1840, to
attend the third general conference in Manchester, at which five of
the Apostles met with the Saints and had a time of rejoicing. At this
conference three thousand six hundred and twenty-six members were
represented, more than double the number reported at the conference
held six months before. From this showing the readers can judge of
the rapidity with which the work had increased, and new fields were
constantly opening up. The Elders met with powerful opposition in many
places, but the more they were opposed the faster the work grew.

It would seem that among other things predicted upon the head of Elder
Kimball by the Prophet previous to starting, was that he should see
the queen of England. He records the fulfillment of this prediction as
follows: "Elder Woodruff, Sister Ellen Redman, Dr. Copeland and wife,
and I had a fair view of the queen. We saw her as the Prophet Joseph
told us. * * * We stood within eight or nine feet of her when she
passed and returned. She made her obeisance to us, and we returned it.
She is a pleasant little body, but what a fuss there is made over one
little girl; and how much more I would enjoy the privilege of sitting
by my humble fireside with my wife and little children, and to see my
brethren and sisters whom I have formed acquaintance with in days of
affliction."

Though averse to royalty, as might be inferred from the foregoing, it
would seem that he had a high regard personally for the Queen and her
consort, Prince Albert, and he and his brethren presented each of them
with a handsomely bound copy of the Book of Mormon, with their names
upon them.

In February, 1841, in writing of the anxiety of the newly converted
Saints to emigrate to America, he said, "I expect trouble is coming
there as well as here. I feel as though I wanted to be there, and share
with them, if they suffer. I would rather suffer affliction with the
Saints of God than to have the pleasures of this world for a season;
for to me it is all vanity. My prayer is that the Almighty will give
me grace and patience to endure and hold on to the iron rod. If we
do this, we shall do well. When He has spoken through His prophet or
predicted anything on this Church, it has come to pass, and the honest
have to suffer with the guilty. This has always been the case, but I
pray the Lord to help me to fulfill, in all points of the law which
leads to the celestial world."

He mentions a visit which he made to Bedford, where he remained a week
and preached every night to crowded assemblies. He also baptized many,
among whom were a number of the followers of a Mr. Matthews, a spurious
Latter-day Saint preacher, who had baptized himself, and started out
preaching faith, repentance, baptism, etc. He was a partner of Mr.
Aitkin in Liverpool, and a man of considerable natural ability. Elder
Kimball denounced him publicly, and when he took leave of Bedford, he
"left the whole town in an uproar."

He also went to Birmingham, Manchester, Wales, Preston and Clitheroe,
holding farewell meetings with the Saints, and baptizing more or less
everywhere he went. At the latter place he was presented with the
following

TESTIMONIAL:

"March 28, 1841.

"_To all in these last days called to be Saints, and to the faithful in
Christ Jesus, grace be to you, and peace from God, our Father, and from
the Lord Jesus Christ_.

"We, the brethren and sisters of the various churches associated in
the conference assembling at Clitheroe, in the County of Lancaster,
England, unitedly and with strong feelings of gratitude and affection,
bear testimony that our brother, Elder Heber C. Kimball, has, in
the midst of opposition and in the face of persecution and slander,
diligently and faithfully labored as a servant of the Most High God;
and we pray you in the name of Jesus Christ to receive him as such,
rendering unto him every necessary assistance to aid him in the work
of the Lord; and may the Spirit of Truth ever be with our brother, and
with all the Saints of God. Amen.

"Signed on behalf of the conference,

"THOMAS WARD, Presiding Elder,

"STEPHEN LANGSTROFF."

On the 20th of April, 1841, he writes: "President Brigham Young, Orson
Pratt, Wilford Woodruff, John Taylor, George A. Smith, Willard Richards
and myself, with a company of one hundred and thirty Saints, are on
board the ship _Rochester_, bound for New York. Brother P.P. Pratt and
a multitude of the Saints came to bid us farewell, and many of them
wept like children when we left them to return to our native land."

The following is from President Brigham Young's journal: "It truly
seems a miracle to look upon the contrast between our landing and
departure from Liverpool. We landed in the spring of 1840, as strangers
in a strange land, and penniless, but through the mercy of God we have
gained many friends, established churches in almost every noted town
and city of Great Britain, baptized between 7,000 and 8,000 souls,
printed 5,000 Books of Mormon, 3,000 hymn books, 2,500 volumes of the
_Millennial Star_ and 50,000 tracts; emigrated to Zion 1,000 souls,
established a permanent shipping agency, which will be a great blessing
to the Saints, and have left sown in the hearts of many thousands the
seed of eternal life, which shall bring forth fruit to the honor and
glory of God; and yet we have lacked nothing to eat, drink or wear; in
all these things I acknowledge the hand of God."

Of his return home Elder Kimball records: "On the 1st of July,
President Brigham Young, John Taylor and myself landed at Nauvoo, where
we were met by the Prophet and a host of friends who had gathered there
to welcome us home again."



Transcriber's Note:

Some obvious printer's errors have been corrected as seems reasonable
(e. g. riyer for river, yon for you, wth for with, rembembered for
remembered, mismatched quotation marks, etc. etc.). The book used
as a reference for this e-book was donated to the library of the
University of California (Berkeley) in April 1886 by Pres. John
Taylor and digitized by the Internet Archive in 2008 with funding
from Microsoft Corporation. It can be viewed or downloaded at
https://archive.org/details/presidentheberck00kimbrich.





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of President Heber C. Kimball's Journal, by 
Heber C. Kimball

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK PRESIDENT HEBER KIMBALL'S JOURNAL ***

***** This file should be named 47519.txt or 47519.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/4/7/5/1/47519/

Produced by Paul Freebairn and the Mormon Texts Project
(MormonTextsProject.org).

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
be renamed.

Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United
States without permission and without paying copyright
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for the eBooks, unless you receive
specific permission. If you do not charge anything for copies of this
eBook, complying with the rules is very easy. You may use this eBook
for nearly any purpose such as creation of derivative works, reports,
performances and research. They may be modified and printed and given
away--you may do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks
not protected by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the
trademark license, especially commercial redistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/license.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works

1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
you share it without charge with others.

1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country outside the United States.

1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:

  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  United States, you'll have to check the laws of the country where you
  are located before using this ebook.

1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
provided that

* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  Literary Archive Foundation."

* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  works.

* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  receipt of the work.

* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and The
Project Gutenberg Trademark LLC, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark. Contact the Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
without further opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
remaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
Defect you cause.

Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
www.gutenberg.org



Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is in Fairbanks, Alaska, with the
mailing address: PO Box 750175, Fairbanks, AK 99775, but its
volunteers and employees are scattered throughout numerous
locations. Its business office is located at 809 North 1500 West, Salt
Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up to
date contact information can be found at the Foundation's web site and
official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

For additional contact information:

    Dr. Gregory B. Newby
    Chief Executive and Director
    gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works.

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search
facility: www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
